Illinois, session 104th, HB1456.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.37 rep.)5    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 6amended by repealing Section 5-45.37. 7    Section 10. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 8changing Sections 5-2, 5-5, and 12-4.35 as follows: 9    (305 ILCS 5/5-2)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5-2)10    Sec. 5-2. Classes of persons eligible. Medical assistance 11under this Article shall be available to any of the following 12classes of persons in respect to whom a plan for coverage has 13been submitted to the Governor by the Illinois Department and 14approved by him. If changes made in this Section 5-2 require 15federal approval, they shall not take effect until such 16approval has been received:17        1. Recipients of basic maintenance grants under 18    Articles III and IV.19        2. Beginning January 1, 2014, persons otherwise 20    eligible for basic maintenance under Article III, 21    excluding any eligibility requirements that are 22    inconsistent with any federal law or federal regulation,   HB1456- 2 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    as interpreted by the U.S. Department of Health and Human 2    Services, but who fail to qualify thereunder on the basis 3    of need, and who have insufficient income and resources to 4    meet the costs of necessary medical care, including, but 5    not limited to, the following:6            (a) All persons otherwise eligible for basic 7        maintenance under Article III but who fail to qualify 8        under that Article on the basis of need and who meet 9        either of the following requirements:10                (i) their income, as determined by the 11            Illinois Department in accordance with any federal 12            requirements, is equal to or less than 100% of the 13            federal poverty level; or14                (ii) their income, after the deduction of 15            costs incurred for medical care and for other 16            types of remedial care, is equal to or less than 17            100% of the federal poverty level.18            (b) (Blank).19        3. (Blank).20        4. Persons not eligible under any of the preceding 21    paragraphs who fall sick, are injured, or die, not having 22    sufficient money, property or other resources to meet the 23    costs of necessary medical care or funeral and burial 24    expenses.25        5.(a) Beginning January 1, 2020, individuals during 26    pregnancy and during the 12-month period beginning on the   HB1456- 3 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    last day of the pregnancy, together with their infants, 2    whose income is at or below 200% of the federal poverty 3    level. Until September 30, 2019, or sooner if the 4    maintenance of effort requirements under the Patient 5    Protection and Affordable Care Act are eliminated or may 6    be waived before then, individuals during pregnancy and 7    during the 12-month period beginning on the last day of 8    the pregnancy, whose countable monthly income, after the 9    deduction of costs incurred for medical care and for other 10    types of remedial care as specified in administrative 11    rule, is equal to or less than the Medical Assistance-No 12    Grant(C) (MANG(C)) Income Standard in effect on April 1, 13    2013 as set forth in administrative rule.14        (b) The plan for coverage shall provide ambulatory 15    prenatal care to pregnant individuals during a presumptive 16    eligibility period and establish an income eligibility 17    standard that is equal to 200% of the federal poverty 18    level, provided that costs incurred for medical care are 19    not taken into account in determining such income 20    eligibility.21        (c) The Illinois Department may conduct a 22    demonstration in at least one county that will provide 23    medical assistance to pregnant individuals together with 24    their infants and children up to one year of age, where the 25    income eligibility standard is set up to 185% of the 26    nonfarm income official poverty line, as defined by the   HB1456- 4 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    federal Office of Management and Budget. The Illinois 2    Department shall seek and obtain necessary authorization 3    provided under federal law to implement such a 4    demonstration. Such demonstration may establish resource 5    standards that are not more restrictive than those 6    established under Article IV of this Code.7        6. (a) Subject to federal approval, children younger 8    than age 19 when countable income is at or below 313% of 9    the federal poverty level, as determined by the Department 10    and in accordance with all applicable federal 11    requirements. The Department is authorized to adopt 12    emergency rules to implement the changes made to this 13    paragraph by Public Act 102-43. Until September 30, 2019, 14    or sooner if the maintenance of effort requirements under 15    the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act are 16    eliminated or may be waived before then, children younger 17    than age 19 whose countable monthly income, after the 18    deduction of costs incurred for medical care and for other 19    types of remedial care as specified in administrative 20    rule, is equal to or less than the Medical Assistance-No 21    Grant(C) (MANG(C)) Income Standard in effect on April 1, 22    2013 as set forth in administrative rule.23        (b) Children and youth who are under temporary custody 24    or guardianship of the Department of Children and Family 25    Services or who receive financial assistance in support of 26    an adoption or guardianship placement from the Department   HB1456- 5 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    of Children and Family Services. 2        7. (Blank).3        8. As required under federal law, persons who are 4    eligible for Transitional Medical Assistance as a result 5    of an increase in earnings or child or spousal support 6    received. The plan for coverage for this class of persons 7    shall:8            (a) extend the medical assistance coverage to the 9        extent required by federal law; and10            (b) offer persons who have initially received 6 11        months of the coverage provided in paragraph (a) 12        above, the option of receiving an additional 6 months 13        of coverage, subject to the following:14                (i) such coverage shall be pursuant to 15            provisions of the federal Social Security Act;16                (ii) such coverage shall include all services 17            covered under Illinois' State Medicaid Plan;18                (iii) no premium shall be charged for such 19            coverage; and20                (iv) such coverage shall be suspended in the 21            event of a person's failure without good cause to 22            file in a timely fashion reports required for this 23            coverage under the Social Security Act and 24            coverage shall be reinstated upon the filing of 25            such reports if the person remains otherwise 26            eligible.  HB1456- 6 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1        9. Persons with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome 2    (AIDS) or with AIDS-related conditions with respect to 3    whom there has been a determination that but for home or 4    community-based services such individuals would require 5    the level of care provided in an inpatient hospital, 6    skilled nursing facility or intermediate care facility the 7    cost of which is reimbursed under this Article. Assistance 8    shall be provided to such persons to the maximum extent 9    permitted under Title XIX of the Federal Social Security 10    Act.11        10. Participants in the long-term care insurance 12    partnership program established under the Illinois 13    Long-Term Care Partnership Program Act who meet the 14    qualifications for protection of resources described in 15    Section 15 of that Act.16        11. Persons with disabilities who are employed and 17    eligible for Medicaid, pursuant to Section 18    1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(xv) of the Social Security Act, and, 19    subject to federal approval, persons with a medically 20    improved disability who are employed and eligible for 21    Medicaid pursuant to Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(xvi) of 22    the Social Security Act, as provided by the Illinois 23    Department by rule. In establishing eligibility standards 24    under this paragraph 11, the Department shall, subject to 25    federal approval:26            (a) set the income eligibility standard at not   HB1456- 7 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1        lower than 350% of the federal poverty level;2            (b) exempt retirement accounts that the person 3        cannot access without penalty before the age of 59 4        1/2, and medical savings accounts established pursuant 5        to 26 U.S.C. 220;6            (c) allow non-exempt assets up to $25,000 as to 7        those assets accumulated during periods of eligibility 8        under this paragraph 11; and9            (d) continue to apply subparagraphs (b) and (c) in 10        determining the eligibility of the person under this 11        Article even if the person loses eligibility under 12        this paragraph 11. 13        12. Subject to federal approval, persons who are 14    eligible for medical assistance coverage under applicable 15    provisions of the federal Social Security Act and the 16    federal Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and 17    Treatment Act of 2000. Those eligible persons are defined 18    to include, but not be limited to, the following persons:19            (1) persons who have been screened for breast or 20        cervical cancer under the U.S. Centers for Disease 21        Control and Prevention Breast and Cervical Cancer 22        Program established under Title XV of the federal 23        Public Health Service Act in accordance with the 24        requirements of Section 1504 of that Act as 25        administered by the Illinois Department of Public 26        Health; and  HB1456- 8 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1            (2) persons whose screenings under the above 2        program were funded in whole or in part by funds 3        appropriated to the Illinois Department of Public 4        Health for breast or cervical cancer screening.5        "Medical assistance" under this paragraph 12 shall be 6    identical to the benefits provided under the State's 7    approved plan under Title XIX of the Social Security Act. 8    The Department must request federal approval of the 9    coverage under this paragraph 12 within 30 days after July 10    3, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 92-47).11        In addition to the persons who are eligible for 12    medical assistance pursuant to subparagraphs (1) and (2) 13    of this paragraph 12, and to be paid from funds 14    appropriated to the Department for its medical programs, 15    any uninsured person as defined by the Department in rules 16    residing in Illinois who is younger than 65 years of age, 17    who has been screened for breast and cervical cancer in 18    accordance with standards and procedures adopted by the 19    Department of Public Health for screening, and who is 20    referred to the Department by the Department of Public 21    Health as being in need of treatment for breast or 22    cervical cancer is eligible for medical assistance 23    benefits that are consistent with the benefits provided to 24    those persons described in subparagraphs (1) and (2). 25    Medical assistance coverage for the persons who are 26    eligible under the preceding sentence is not dependent on   HB1456- 9 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    federal approval, but federal moneys may be used to pay 2    for services provided under that coverage upon federal 3    approval. 4        13. Subject to appropriation and to federal approval, 5    persons living with HIV/AIDS who are not otherwise 6    eligible under this Article and who qualify for services 7    covered under Section 5-5.04 as provided by the Illinois 8    Department by rule. 9        14. Subject to the availability of funds for this 10    purpose, the Department may provide coverage under this 11    Article to persons who reside in Illinois who are not 12    eligible under any of the preceding paragraphs and who 13    meet the income guidelines of paragraph 2(a) of this 14    Section and (i) have an application for asylum pending 15    before the federal Department of Homeland Security or on 16    appeal before a court of competent jurisdiction and are 17    represented either by counsel or by an advocate accredited 18    by the federal Department of Homeland Security and 19    employed by a not-for-profit organization in regard to 20    that application or appeal, or (ii) are receiving services 21    through a federally funded torture treatment center. 22    Medical coverage under this paragraph 14 may be provided 23    for up to 24 continuous months from the initial 24    eligibility date so long as an individual continues to 25    satisfy the criteria of this paragraph 14. If an 26    individual has an appeal pending regarding an application   HB1456- 10 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    for asylum before the Department of Homeland Security, 2    eligibility under this paragraph 14 may be extended until 3    a final decision is rendered on the appeal. The Department 4    may adopt rules governing the implementation of this 5    paragraph 14. 6        15. Family Care Eligibility.7            (a) On and after July 1, 2012, a parent or other 8        caretaker relative who is 19 years of age or older when 9        countable income is at or below 133% of the federal 10        poverty level. A person may not spend down to become 11        eligible under this paragraph 15. 12            (b) Eligibility shall be reviewed annually.13            (c) (Blank).14            (d) (Blank).15            (e) (Blank).16            (f) (Blank).17            (g) (Blank).18            (h) (Blank).19            (i) Following termination of an individual's 20        coverage under this paragraph 15, the individual must 21        be determined eligible before the person can be 22        re-enrolled.23        16. Subject to appropriation, uninsured persons who 24    are not otherwise eligible under this Section who have 25    been certified and referred by the Department of Public 26    Health as having been screened and found to need   HB1456- 11 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    diagnostic evaluation or treatment, or both diagnostic 2    evaluation and treatment, for prostate or testicular 3    cancer. For the purposes of this paragraph 16, uninsured 4    persons are those who do not have creditable coverage, as 5    defined under the Health Insurance Portability and 6    Accountability Act, or have otherwise exhausted any 7    insurance benefits they may have had, for prostate or 8    testicular cancer diagnostic evaluation or treatment, or 9    both diagnostic evaluation and treatment. To be eligible, 10    a person must furnish a Social Security number. A person's 11    assets are exempt from consideration in determining 12    eligibility under this paragraph 16. Such persons shall be 13    eligible for medical assistance under this paragraph 16 14    for so long as they need treatment for the cancer. A person 15    shall be considered to need treatment if, in the opinion 16    of the person's treating physician, the person requires 17    therapy directed toward cure or palliation of prostate or 18    testicular cancer, including recurrent metastatic cancer 19    that is a known or presumed complication of prostate or 20    testicular cancer and complications resulting from the 21    treatment modalities themselves. Persons who require only 22    routine monitoring services are not considered to need 23    treatment. "Medical assistance" under this paragraph 16 24    shall be identical to the benefits provided under the 25    State's approved plan under Title XIX of the Social 26    Security Act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,   HB1456- 12 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    the Department (i) does not have a claim against the 2    estate of a deceased recipient of services under this 3    paragraph 16 and (ii) does not have a lien against any 4    homestead property or other legal or equitable real 5    property interest owned by a recipient of services under 6    this paragraph 16.7        17. Persons who, pursuant to a waiver approved by the 8    Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human 9    Services, are eligible for medical assistance under Title 10    XIX or XXI of the federal Social Security Act. 11    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code and 12    consistent with the terms of the approved waiver, the 13    Illinois Department, may by rule: 14            (a) Limit the geographic areas in which the waiver 15        program operates. 16            (b) Determine the scope, quantity, duration, and 17        quality, and the rate and method of reimbursement, of 18        the medical services to be provided, which may differ 19        from those for other classes of persons eligible for 20        assistance under this Article. 21            (c) Restrict the persons' freedom in choice of 22        providers. 23        18. Beginning January 1, 2014, persons aged 19 or 24    older, but younger than 65, who are not otherwise eligible 25    for medical assistance under this Section 5-2, who qualify 26    for medical assistance pursuant to 42 U.S.C.   HB1456- 13 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) and applicable federal 2    regulations, and who have income at or below 133% of the 3    federal poverty level plus 5% for the applicable family 4    size as determined pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1396a(e)(14) and 5    applicable federal regulations. Persons eligible for 6    medical assistance under this paragraph 18 shall receive 7    coverage for the Health Benefits Service Package as that 8    term is defined in subsection (m) of Section 5-1.1 of this 9    Code. If Illinois' federal medical assistance percentage 10    (FMAP) is reduced below 90% for persons eligible for 11    medical assistance under this paragraph 18, eligibility 12    under this paragraph 18 shall cease no later than the end 13    of the third month following the month in which the 14    reduction in FMAP takes effect. 15        19. Beginning January 1, 2014, as required under 42 16    U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(IX), persons older than age 18 17    and younger than age 26 who are not otherwise eligible for 18    medical assistance under paragraphs (1) through (17) of 19    this Section who (i) were in foster care under the 20    responsibility of the State on the date of attaining age 21    18 or on the date of attaining age 21 when a court has 22    continued wardship for good cause as provided in Section 23    2-31 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 and (ii) received 24    medical assistance under the Illinois Title XIX State Plan 25    or waiver of such plan while in foster care. 26        20. Beginning January 1, 2018, persons who are   HB1456- 14 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    foreign-born victims of human trafficking, torture, or 2    other serious crimes as defined in Section 2-19 of this 3    Code and their derivative family members if such persons: 4    (i) reside in Illinois; (ii) are not eligible under any of 5    the preceding paragraphs; (iii) meet the income guidelines 6    of subparagraph (a) of paragraph 2; and (iv) meet the 7    nonfinancial eligibility requirements of Sections 16-2, 8    16-3, and 16-5 of this Code. The Department may extend 9    medical assistance for persons who are foreign-born 10    victims of human trafficking, torture, or other serious 11    crimes whose medical assistance would be terminated 12    pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 16-5 if the 13    Department determines that the person, during the year of 14    initial eligibility (1) experienced a health crisis, (2) 15    has been unable, after reasonable attempts, to obtain 16    necessary information from a third party, or (3) has other 17    extenuating circumstances that prevented the person from 18    completing his or her application for status. The 19    Department may adopt any rules necessary to implement the 20    provisions of this paragraph.21        21. (Blank). Persons who are not otherwise eligible 22    for medical assistance under this Section who may qualify 23    for medical assistance pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 24    1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XXIII) and 42 U.S.C. 1396(ss) for the 25    duration of any federal or State declared emergency due to 26    COVID-19. Medical assistance to persons eligible for   HB1456- 15 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    medical assistance solely pursuant to this paragraph 21 2    shall be limited to any in vitro diagnostic product (and 3    the administration of such product) described in 42 U.S.C. 4    1396d(a)(3)(B) on or after March 18, 2020, any visit 5    described in 42 U.S.C. 1396o(a)(2)(G), or any other 6    medical assistance that may be federally authorized for 7    this class of persons. The Department may also cover 8    treatment of COVID-19 for this class of persons, or any 9    similar category of uninsured individuals, to the extent 10    authorized under a federally approved 1115 Waiver or other 11    federal authority. Notwithstanding the provisions of 12    Section 1-11 of this Code, due to the nature of the 13    COVID-19 public health emergency, the Department may cover 14    and provide the medical assistance described in this 15    paragraph 21 to noncitizens who would otherwise meet the 16    eligibility requirements for the class of persons 17    described in this paragraph 21 for the duration of the 18    State emergency period. 19    In implementing the provisions of Public Act 96-20, the 20Department is authorized to adopt only those rules necessary, 21including emergency rules. Nothing in Public Act 96-20 permits 22the Department to adopt rules or issue a decision that expands 23eligibility for the FamilyCare Program to a person whose 24income exceeds 185% of the Federal Poverty Level as determined 25from time to time by the U.S. Department of Health and Human 26Services, unless the Department is provided with express   HB1456- 16 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1statutory authority. 2    The eligibility of any such person for medical assistance 3under this Article is not affected by the payment of any grant 4under the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities 5Property Tax Relief Act or any distributions or items of 6income described under subparagraph (X) of paragraph (2) of 7subsection (a) of Section 203 of the Illinois Income Tax Act.8    The Department shall by rule establish the amounts of 9assets to be disregarded in determining eligibility for 10medical assistance, which shall at a minimum equal the amounts 11to be disregarded under the Federal Supplemental Security 12Income Program. The amount of assets of a single person to be 13disregarded shall not be less than $2,000, and the amount of 14assets of a married couple to be disregarded shall not be less 15than $3,000.16    To the extent permitted under federal law, any person 17found guilty of a second violation of Article VIIIA shall be 18ineligible for medical assistance under this Article, as 19provided in Section 8A-8.20    The eligibility of any person for medical assistance under 21this Article shall not be affected by the receipt by the person 22of donations or benefits from fundraisers held for the person 23in cases of serious illness, as long as neither the person nor 24members of the person's family have actual control over the 25donations or benefits or the disbursement of the donations or 26benefits.  HB1456- 17 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, if the 2United States Supreme Court holds Title II, Subtitle A, 3Section 2001(a) of Public Law 111-148 to be unconstitutional, 4or if a holding of Public Law 111-148 makes Medicaid 5eligibility allowed under Section 2001(a) inoperable, the 6State or a unit of local government shall be prohibited from 7enrolling individuals in the Medical Assistance Program as the 8result of federal approval of a State Medicaid waiver on or 9after June 14, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-687), 10and any individuals enrolled in the Medical Assistance Program 11pursuant to eligibility permitted as a result of such a State 12Medicaid waiver shall become immediately ineligible. 13    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, if an 14Act of Congress that becomes a Public Law eliminates Section 152001(a) of Public Law 111-148, the State or a unit of local 16government shall be prohibited from enrolling individuals in 17the Medical Assistance Program as the result of federal 18approval of a State Medicaid waiver on or after June 14, 2012 19(the effective date of Public Act 97-687), and any individuals 20enrolled in the Medical Assistance Program pursuant to 21eligibility permitted as a result of such a State Medicaid 22waiver shall become immediately ineligible. 23    Effective October 1, 2013, the determination of 24eligibility of persons who qualify under paragraphs 5, 6, 8, 2515, 17, and 18 of this Section shall comply with the 26requirements of 42 U.S.C. 1396a(e)(14) and applicable federal   HB1456- 18 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1regulations. 2    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services, the 3Department of Human Services, and the Illinois health 4insurance marketplace shall work cooperatively to assist 5persons who would otherwise lose health benefits as a result 6of changes made under Public Act 98-104 to transition to other 7health insurance coverage. 8(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19; 101-649, eff. 7-7-20; 9102-43, eff. 7-6-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-665, eff. 1010-8-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 11    (305 ILCS 5/5-5)12    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)13    Sec. 5-5. Medical services. The Illinois Department, by 14rule, shall determine the quantity and quality of and the rate 15of reimbursement for the medical assistance for which payment 16will be authorized, and the medical services to be provided, 17which may include all or part of the following: (1) inpatient 18hospital services; (2) outpatient hospital services; (3) other 19laboratory and X-ray services; (4) skilled nursing home 20services; (5) physicians' services whether furnished in the 21office, the patient's home, a hospital, a skilled nursing 22home, or elsewhere; (6) medical care, or any other type of 23remedial care furnished by licensed practitioners; (7) home 24health care services; (8) private duty nursing service; (9) 25clinic services; (10) dental services, including prevention   HB1456- 19 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1and treatment of periodontal disease and dental caries disease 2for pregnant individuals, provided by an individual licensed 3to practice dentistry or dental surgery; for purposes of this 4item (10), "dental services" means diagnostic, preventive, or 5corrective procedures provided by or under the supervision of 6a dentist in the practice of his or her profession; (11) 7physical therapy and related services; (12) prescribed drugs, 8dentures, and prosthetic devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by 9a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye, or by an 10optometrist, whichever the person may select; (13) other 11diagnostic, screening, preventive, and rehabilitative 12services, including to ensure that the individual's need for 13intervention or treatment of mental disorders or substance use 14disorders or co-occurring mental health and substance use 15disorders is determined using a uniform screening, assessment, 16and evaluation process inclusive of criteria, for children and 17adults; for purposes of this item (13), a uniform screening, 18assessment, and evaluation process refers to a process that 19includes an appropriate evaluation and, as warranted, a 20referral; "uniform" does not mean the use of a singular 21instrument, tool, or process that all must utilize; (14) 22transportation and such other expenses as may be necessary; 23(15) medical treatment of sexual assault survivors, as defined 24in Section 1a of the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 25Treatment Act, for injuries sustained as a result of the 26sexual assault, including examinations and laboratory tests to   HB1456- 20 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1discover evidence which may be used in criminal proceedings 2arising from the sexual assault; (16) the diagnosis and 3treatment of sickle cell anemia; (16.5) services performed by 4a chiropractic physician licensed under the Medical Practice 5Act of 1987 and acting within the scope of his or her license, 6including, but not limited to, chiropractic manipulative 7treatment; and (17) any other medical care, and any other type 8of remedial care recognized under the laws of this State. The 9term "any other type of remedial care" shall include nursing 10care and nursing home service for persons who rely on 11treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer for healing. 12    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 13comprehensive tobacco use cessation program that includes 14purchasing prescription drugs or prescription medical devices 15approved by the Food and Drug Administration shall be covered 16under the medical assistance program under this Article for 17persons who are otherwise eligible for assistance under this 18Article. 19    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 20reproductive health care that is otherwise legal in Illinois 21shall be covered under the medical assistance program for 22persons who are otherwise eligible for medical assistance 23under this Article. 24    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, all 25tobacco cessation medications approved by the United States 26Food and Drug Administration and all individual and group   HB1456- 21 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1tobacco cessation counseling services and telephone-based 2counseling services and tobacco cessation medications provided 3through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline shall be covered under 4the medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 5eligible for assistance under this Article. The Department 6shall comply with all federal requirements necessary to obtain 7federal financial participation, as specified in 42 CFR 8433.15(b)(7), for telephone-based counseling services provided 9through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline, including, but not 10limited to: (i) entering into a memorandum of understanding or 11interagency agreement with the Department of Public Health, as 12administrator of the Illinois Tobacco Quitline; and (ii) 13developing a cost allocation plan for Medicaid-allowable 14Illinois Tobacco Quitline services in accordance with 45 CFR 1595.507. The Department shall submit the memorandum of 16understanding or interagency agreement, the cost allocation 17plan, and all other necessary documentation to the Centers for 18Medicare and Medicaid Services for review and approval. 19Coverage under this paragraph shall be contingent upon federal 20approval.21    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 22Illinois Department may not require, as a condition of payment 23for any laboratory test authorized under this Article, that a 24physician's handwritten signature appear on the laboratory 25test order form. The Illinois Department may, however, impose 26other appropriate requirements regarding laboratory test order   HB1456- 22 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1documentation. 2    Upon receipt of federal approval of an amendment to the 3Illinois Title XIX State Plan for this purpose, the Department 4shall authorize the Chicago Public Schools (CPS) to procure a 5vendor or vendors to manufacture eyeglasses for individuals 6enrolled in a school within the CPS system. CPS shall ensure 7that its vendor or vendors are enrolled as providers in the 8medical assistance program and in any capitated Medicaid 9managed care entity (MCE) serving individuals enrolled in a 10school within the CPS system. Under any contract procured 11under this provision, the vendor or vendors must serve only 12individuals enrolled in a school within the CPS system. Claims 13for services provided by CPS's vendor or vendors to recipients 14of benefits in the medical assistance program under this Code, 15the Children's Health Insurance Program, or the Covering ALL 16KIDS Health Insurance Program shall be submitted to the 17Department or the MCE in which the individual is enrolled for 18payment and shall be reimbursed at the Department's or the 19MCE's established rates or rate methodologies for eyeglasses. 20    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department of Healthcare 21and Family Services may provide the following services to 22persons eligible for assistance under this Article who are 23participating in education, training or employment programs 24operated by the Department of Human Services as successor to 25the Department of Public Aid:26        (1) dental services provided by or under the   HB1456- 23 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    supervision of a dentist; and 2        (2) eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in 3    the diseases of the eye, or by an optometrist, whichever 4    the person may select.5    On and after July 1, 2018, the Department of Healthcare 6and Family Services shall provide dental services to any adult 7who is otherwise eligible for assistance under the medical 8assistance program. As used in this paragraph, "dental 9services" means diagnostic, preventative, restorative, or 10corrective procedures, including procedures and services for 11the prevention and treatment of periodontal disease and dental 12caries disease, provided by an individual who is licensed to 13practice dentistry or dental surgery or who is under the 14supervision of a dentist in the practice of his or her 15profession.16    On and after July 1, 2018, targeted dental services, as 17set forth in Exhibit D of the Consent Decree entered by the 18United States District Court for the Northern District of 19Illinois, Eastern Division, in the matter of Memisovski v. 20Maram, Case No. 92 C 1982, that are provided to adults under 21the medical assistance program shall be established at no less 22than the rates set forth in the "New Rate" column in Exhibit D 23of the Consent Decree for targeted dental services that are 24provided to persons under the age of 18 under the medical 25assistance program. 26    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2025,   HB1456- 24 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1the rates paid for sedation evaluation and the provision of 2deep sedation and intravenous sedation for the purpose of 3dental services shall be increased by 33% above the rates in 4effect on December 31, 2024. The rates paid for nitrous oxide 5sedation shall not be impacted by this paragraph and shall 6remain the same as the rates in effect on December 31, 2024. 7    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code and 8subject to federal approval, the Department may adopt rules to 9allow a dentist who is volunteering his or her service at no 10cost to render dental services through an enrolled 11not-for-profit health clinic without the dentist personally 12enrolling as a participating provider in the medical 13assistance program. A not-for-profit health clinic shall 14include a public health clinic or Federally Qualified Health 15Center or other enrolled provider, as determined by the 16Department, through which dental services covered under this 17Section are performed. The Department shall establish a 18process for payment of claims for reimbursement for covered 19dental services rendered under this provision. 20    Subject to appropriation and to federal approval, the 21Department shall file administrative rules updating the 22Handicapping Labio-Lingual Deviation orthodontic scoring tool 23by January 1, 2025, or as soon as practicable. 24    On and after January 1, 2022, the Department of Healthcare 25and Family Services shall administer and regulate a 26school-based dental program that allows for the out-of-office   HB1456- 25 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1delivery of preventative dental services in a school setting 2to children under 19 years of age. The Department shall 3establish, by rule, guidelines for participation by providers 4and set requirements for follow-up referral care based on the 5requirements established in the Dental Office Reference Manual 6published by the Department that establishes the requirements 7for dentists participating in the All Kids Dental School 8Program. Every effort shall be made by the Department when 9developing the program requirements to consider the different 10geographic differences of both urban and rural areas of the 11State for initial treatment and necessary follow-up care. No 12provider shall be charged a fee by any unit of local government 13to participate in the school-based dental program administered 14by the Department. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 15construed to limit or preempt a home rule unit's or school 16district's authority to establish, change, or administer a 17school-based dental program in addition to, or independent of, 18the school-based dental program administered by the 19Department. 20    The Illinois Department, by rule, may distinguish and 21classify the medical services to be provided only in 22accordance with the classes of persons designated in Section 235-2. 24    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services must 25provide coverage and reimbursement for amino acid-based 26elemental formulas, regardless of delivery method, for the   HB1456- 26 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1diagnosis and treatment of (i) eosinophilic disorders and (ii) 2short bowel syndrome when the prescribing physician has issued 3a written order stating that the amino acid-based elemental 4formula is medically necessary. 5    The Illinois Department shall authorize the provision of, 6and shall authorize payment for, screening by low-dose 7mammography for the presence of occult breast cancer for 8individuals 35 years of age or older who are eligible for 9medical assistance under this Article, as follows:10        (A) A baseline mammogram for individuals 35 to 39 11    years of age. 12        (B) An annual mammogram for individuals 40 years of 13    age or older.14        (C) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 15    medically necessary by the individual's health care 16    provider for individuals under 40 years of age and having 17    a family history of breast cancer, prior personal history 18    of breast cancer, positive genetic testing, or other risk 19    factors.20        (D) A comprehensive ultrasound screening and MRI of an 21    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 22    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 23    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 24    practice medicine in all of its branches. 25        (E) A screening MRI when medically necessary, as 26    determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine in   HB1456- 27 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    all of its branches. 2        (F) A diagnostic mammogram when medically necessary, 3    as determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine 4    in all its branches, advanced practice registered nurse, 5    or physician assistant. 6    The Department shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, 7copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on the 8coverage provided under this paragraph; except that this 9sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 10to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 11health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 12pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 13U.S.C. 223). 14    All screenings shall include a physical breast exam, 15instruction on self-examination and information regarding the 16frequency of self-examination and its value as a preventative 17tool.18    For purposes of this Section:19    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using 20diagnostic mammography.21    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that 22is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 23an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a 24subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the 25breast.26    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the   HB1456- 28 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 2including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and 3image receptor, with an average radiation exposure delivery of 4less than one rad per breast for 2 views of an average size 5breast. The term also includes digital mammography and 6includes breast tomosynthesis.7    "Breast tomosynthesis" means a radiologic procedure that 8involves the acquisition of projection images over the 9stationary breast to produce cross-sectional digital 10three-dimensional images of the breast.11    If, at any time, the Secretary of the United States 12Department of Health and Human Services, or its successor 13agency, promulgates rules or regulations to be published in 14the Federal Register or publishes a comment in the Federal 15Register or issues an opinion, guidance, or other action that 16would require the State, pursuant to any provision of the 17Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 18111-148), including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C. 1918031(d)(3)(B) or any successor provision, to defray the cost 20of any coverage for breast tomosynthesis outlined in this 21paragraph, then the requirement that an insurer cover breast 22tomosynthesis is inoperative other than any such coverage 23authorized under Section 1902 of the Social Security Act, 42 24U.S.C. 1396a, and the State shall not assume any obligation 25for the cost of coverage for breast tomosynthesis set forth in 26this paragraph.  HB1456- 29 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    On and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall ensure 2that all networks of care for adult clients of the Department 3include access to at least one breast imaging Center of 4Imaging Excellence as certified by the American College of 5Radiology.6    On and after January 1, 2012, providers participating in a 7quality improvement program approved by the Department shall 8be reimbursed for screening and diagnostic mammography at the 9same rate as the Medicare program's rates, including the 10increased reimbursement for digital mammography and, after 11January 1, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1018), 12breast tomosynthesis.13    The Department shall convene an expert panel including 14representatives of hospitals, free-standing mammography 15facilities, and doctors, including radiologists, to establish 16quality standards for mammography.17    On and after January 1, 2017, providers participating in a 18breast cancer treatment quality improvement program approved 19by the Department shall be reimbursed for breast cancer 20treatment at a rate that is no lower than 95% of the Medicare 21program's rates for the data elements included in the breast 22cancer treatment quality program.23    The Department shall convene an expert panel, including 24representatives of hospitals, free-standing breast cancer 25treatment centers, breast cancer quality organizations, and 26doctors, including breast surgeons, reconstructive breast   HB1456- 30 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1surgeons, oncologists, and primary care providers to establish 2quality standards for breast cancer treatment.3    Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 4establish a rate methodology for mammography at federally 5qualified health centers and other encounter-rate clinics. 6These clinics or centers may also collaborate with other 7hospital-based mammography facilities. By January 1, 2016, the 8Department shall report to the General Assembly on the status 9of the provision set forth in this paragraph.10    The Department shall establish a methodology to remind 11individuals who are age-appropriate for screening mammography, 12but who have not received a mammogram within the previous 18 13months, of the importance and benefit of screening 14mammography. The Department shall work with experts in breast 15cancer outreach and patient navigation to optimize these 16reminders and shall establish a methodology for evaluating 17their effectiveness and modifying the methodology based on the 18evaluation.19    The Department shall establish a performance goal for 20primary care providers with respect to their female patients 21over age 40 receiving an annual mammogram. This performance 22goal shall be used to provide additional reimbursement in the 23form of a quality performance bonus to primary care providers 24who meet that goal.25    The Department shall devise a means of case-managing or 26patient navigation for beneficiaries diagnosed with breast   HB1456- 31 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1cancer. This program shall initially operate as a pilot 2program in areas of the State with the highest incidence of 3mortality related to breast cancer. At least one pilot program 4site shall be in the metropolitan Chicago area and at least one 5site shall be outside the metropolitan Chicago area. On or 6after July 1, 2016, the pilot program shall be expanded to 7include one site in western Illinois, one site in southern 8Illinois, one site in central Illinois, and 4 sites within 9metropolitan Chicago. An evaluation of the pilot program shall 10be carried out measuring health outcomes and cost of care for 11those served by the pilot program compared to similarly 12situated patients who are not served by the pilot program. 13    The Department shall require all networks of care to 14develop a means either internally or by contract with experts 15in navigation and community outreach to navigate cancer 16patients to comprehensive care in a timely fashion. The 17Department shall require all networks of care to include 18access for patients diagnosed with cancer to at least one 19academic commission on cancer-accredited cancer program as an 20in-network covered benefit.21    The Department shall provide coverage and reimbursement 22for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine that is approved for 23marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration for all 24persons between the ages of 9 and 45. Subject to federal 25approval, the Department shall provide coverage and 26reimbursement for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine for   HB1456- 32 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1persons of the age of 46 and above who have been diagnosed with 2cervical dysplasia with a high risk of recurrence or 3progression. The Department shall disallow any 4preauthorization requirements for the administration of the 5human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine. 6    On or after July 1, 2022, individuals who are otherwise 7eligible for medical assistance under this Article shall 8receive coverage for perinatal depression screenings for the 912-month period beginning on the last day of their pregnancy. 10Medical assistance coverage under this paragraph shall be 11conditioned on the use of a screening instrument approved by 12the Department.13    Any medical or health care provider shall immediately 14recommend, to any pregnant individual who is being provided 15prenatal services and is suspected of having a substance use 16disorder as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 17referral to a local substance use disorder treatment program 18licensed by the Department of Human Services or to a licensed 19hospital which provides substance abuse treatment services. 20The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall assure 21coverage for the cost of treatment of the drug abuse or 22addiction for pregnant recipients in accordance with the 23Illinois Medicaid Program in conjunction with the Department 24of Human Services. 25    All medical providers providing medical assistance to 26pregnant individuals under this Code shall receive information   HB1456- 33 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1from the Department on the availability of services under any 2program providing case management services for addicted 3individuals, including information on appropriate referrals 4for other social services that may be needed by addicted 5individuals in addition to treatment for addiction. 6    The Illinois Department, in cooperation with the 7Departments of Human Services (as successor to the Department 8of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse) and Public Health, through 9a public awareness campaign, may provide information 10concerning treatment for alcoholism and drug abuse and 11addiction, prenatal health care, and other pertinent programs 12directed at reducing the number of drug-affected infants born 13to recipients of medical assistance. 14    Neither the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 15nor the Department of Human Services shall sanction the 16recipient solely on the basis of the recipient's substance 17abuse. 18    The Illinois Department shall establish such regulations 19governing the dispensing of health services under this Article 20as it shall deem appropriate. The Department should seek the 21advice of formal professional advisory committees appointed by 22the Director of the Illinois Department for the purpose of 23providing regular advice on policy and administrative matters, 24information dissemination and educational activities for 25medical and health care providers, and consistency in 26procedures to the Illinois Department.   HB1456- 34 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    The Illinois Department may develop and contract with 2Partnerships of medical providers to arrange medical services 3for persons eligible under Section 5-2 of this Code. 4Implementation of this Section may be by demonstration 5projects in certain geographic areas. The Partnership shall be 6represented by a sponsor organization. The Department, by 7rule, shall develop qualifications for sponsors of 8Partnerships. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 9require that the sponsor organization be a medical 10organization. 11    The sponsor must negotiate formal written contracts with 12medical providers for physician services, inpatient and 13outpatient hospital care, home health services, treatment for 14alcoholism and substance abuse, and other services determined 15necessary by the Illinois Department by rule for delivery by 16Partnerships. Physician services must include prenatal and 17obstetrical care. The Illinois Department shall reimburse 18medical services delivered by Partnership providers to clients 19in target areas according to provisions of this Article and 20the Illinois Health Finance Reform Act, except that: 21        (1) Physicians participating in a Partnership and 22    providing certain services, which shall be determined by 23    the Illinois Department, to persons in areas covered by 24    the Partnership may receive an additional surcharge for 25    such services. 26        (2) The Department may elect to consider and negotiate   HB1456- 35 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    financial incentives to encourage the development of 2    Partnerships and the efficient delivery of medical care. 3        (3) Persons receiving medical services through 4    Partnerships may receive medical and case management 5    services above the level usually offered through the 6    medical assistance program. 7    Medical providers shall be required to meet certain 8qualifications to participate in Partnerships to ensure the 9delivery of high quality medical services. These 10qualifications shall be determined by rule of the Illinois 11Department and may be higher than qualifications for 12participation in the medical assistance program. Partnership 13sponsors may prescribe reasonable additional qualifications 14for participation by medical providers, only with the prior 15written approval of the Illinois Department. 16    Nothing in this Section shall limit the free choice of 17practitioners, hospitals, and other providers of medical 18services by clients. In order to ensure patient freedom of 19choice, the Illinois Department shall immediately promulgate 20all rules and take all other necessary actions so that 21provided services may be accessed from therapeutically 22certified optometrists to the full extent of the Illinois 23Optometric Practice Act of 1987 without discriminating between 24service providers. 25    The Department shall apply for a waiver from the United 26States Health Care Financing Administration to allow for the   HB1456- 36 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1implementation of Partnerships under this Section. 2    The Illinois Department shall require health care 3providers to maintain records that document the medical care 4and services provided to recipients of Medical Assistance 5under this Article. Such records must be retained for a period 6of not less than 6 years from the date of service or as 7provided by applicable State law, whichever period is longer, 8except that if an audit is initiated within the required 9retention period then the records must be retained until the 10audit is completed and every exception is resolved. The 11Illinois Department shall require health care providers to 12make available, when authorized by the patient, in writing, 13the medical records in a timely fashion to other health care 14providers who are treating or serving persons eligible for 15Medical Assistance under this Article. All dispensers of 16medical services shall be required to maintain and retain 17business and professional records sufficient to fully and 18accurately document the nature, scope, details and receipt of 19the health care provided to persons eligible for medical 20assistance under this Code, in accordance with regulations 21promulgated by the Illinois Department. The rules and 22regulations shall require that proof of the receipt of 23prescription drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and 24eyeglasses by eligible persons under this Section accompany 25each claim for reimbursement submitted by the dispenser of 26such medical services. No such claims for reimbursement shall   HB1456- 37 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1be approved for payment by the Illinois Department without 2such proof of receipt, unless the Illinois Department shall 3have put into effect and shall be operating a system of 4post-payment audit and review which shall, on a sampling 5basis, be deemed adequate by the Illinois Department to assure 6that such drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and eyeglasses 7for which payment is being made are actually being received by 8eligible recipients. Within 90 days after September 16, 1984 9(the effective date of Public Act 83-1439), the Illinois 10Department shall establish a current list of acquisition costs 11for all prosthetic devices and any other items recognized as 12medical equipment and supplies reimbursable under this Article 13and shall update such list on a quarterly basis, except that 14the acquisition costs of all prescription drugs shall be 15updated no less frequently than every 30 days as required by 16Section 5-5.12. 17    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 18Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after July 22, 2013 19(the effective date of Public Act 98-104), establish 20procedures to permit skilled care facilities licensed under 21the Nursing Home Care Act to submit monthly billing claims for 22reimbursement purposes. Following development of these 23procedures, the Department shall, by July 1, 2016, test the 24viability of the new system and implement any necessary 25operational or structural changes to its information 26technology platforms in order to allow for the direct   HB1456- 38 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1acceptance and payment of nursing home claims. 2    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 3Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after August 15, 42014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-963), establish 5procedures to permit ID/DD facilities licensed under the ID/DD 6Community Care Act and MC/DD facilities licensed under the 7MC/DD Act to submit monthly billing claims for reimbursement 8purposes. Following development of these procedures, the 9Department shall have an additional 365 days to test the 10viability of the new system and to ensure that any necessary 11operational or structural changes to its information 12technology platforms are implemented. 13    The Illinois Department shall require all dispensers of 14medical services, other than an individual practitioner or 15group of practitioners, desiring to participate in the Medical 16Assistance program established under this Article to disclose 17all financial, beneficial, ownership, equity, surety or other 18interests in any and all firms, corporations, partnerships, 19associations, business enterprises, joint ventures, agencies, 20institutions or other legal entities providing any form of 21health care services in this State under this Article. 22    The Illinois Department may require that all dispensers of 23medical services desiring to participate in the medical 24assistance program established under this Article disclose, 25under such terms and conditions as the Illinois Department may 26by rule establish, all inquiries from clients and attorneys   HB1456- 39 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1regarding medical bills paid by the Illinois Department, which 2inquiries could indicate potential existence of claims or 3liens for the Illinois Department. 4    Enrollment of a vendor shall be subject to a provisional 5period and shall be conditional for one year. During the 6period of conditional enrollment, the Department may terminate 7the vendor's eligibility to participate in, or may disenroll 8the vendor from, the medical assistance program without cause. 9Unless otherwise specified, such termination of eligibility or 10disenrollment is not subject to the Department's hearing 11process. However, a disenrolled vendor may reapply without 12penalty. 13    The Department has the discretion to limit the conditional 14enrollment period for vendors based upon the category of risk 15of the vendor.16    Prior to enrollment and during the conditional enrollment 17period in the medical assistance program, all vendors shall be 18subject to enhanced oversight, screening, and review based on 19the risk of fraud, waste, and abuse that is posed by the 20category of risk of the vendor. The Illinois Department shall 21establish the procedures for oversight, screening, and review, 22which may include, but need not be limited to: criminal and 23financial background checks; fingerprinting; license, 24certification, and authorization verifications; unscheduled or 25unannounced site visits; database checks; prepayment audit 26reviews; audits; payment caps; payment suspensions; and other   HB1456- 40 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1screening as required by federal or State law.2    The Department shall define or specify the following: (i) 3by provider notice, the "category of risk of the vendor" for 4each type of vendor, which shall take into account the level of 5screening applicable to a particular category of vendor under 6federal law and regulations; (ii) by rule or provider notice, 7the maximum length of the conditional enrollment period for 8each category of risk of the vendor; and (iii) by rule, the 9hearing rights, if any, afforded to a vendor in each category 10of risk of the vendor that is terminated or disenrolled during 11the conditional enrollment period. 12    To be eligible for payment consideration, a vendor's 13payment claim or bill, either as an initial claim or as a 14resubmitted claim following prior rejection, must be received 15by the Illinois Department, or its fiscal intermediary, no 16later than 180 days after the latest date on the claim on which 17medical goods or services were provided, with the following 18exceptions:19        (1) In the case of a provider whose enrollment is in 20    process by the Illinois Department, the 180-day period 21    shall not begin until the date on the written notice from 22    the Illinois Department that the provider enrollment is 23    complete.24        (2) In the case of errors attributable to the Illinois 25    Department or any of its claims processing intermediaries 26    which result in an inability to receive, process, or   HB1456- 41 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    adjudicate a claim, the 180-day period shall not begin 2    until the provider has been notified of the error.3        (3) In the case of a provider for whom the Illinois 4    Department initiates the monthly billing process.5        (4) In the case of a provider operated by a unit of 6    local government with a population exceeding 3,000,000 7    when local government funds finance federal participation 8    for claims payments. 9    For claims for services rendered during a period for which 10a recipient received retroactive eligibility, claims must be 11filed within 180 days after the Department determines the 12applicant is eligible. For claims for which the Illinois 13Department is not the primary payer, claims must be submitted 14to the Illinois Department within 180 days after the final 15adjudication by the primary payer.16    In the case of long term care facilities, within 120 17calendar days of receipt by the facility of required 18prescreening information, new admissions with associated 19admission documents shall be submitted through the Medical 20Electronic Data Interchange (MEDI) or the Recipient 21Eligibility Verification (REV) System or shall be submitted 22directly to the Department of Human Services using required 23admission forms. Effective September 1, 2014, admission 24documents, including all prescreening information, must be 25submitted through MEDI or REV. Confirmation numbers assigned 26to an accepted transaction shall be retained by a facility to   HB1456- 42 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1verify timely submittal. Once an admission transaction has 2been completed, all resubmitted claims following prior 3rejection are subject to receipt no later than 180 days after 4the admission transaction has been completed.5    Claims that are not submitted and received in compliance 6with the foregoing requirements shall not be eligible for 7payment under the medical assistance program, and the State 8shall have no liability for payment of those claims.9    To the extent consistent with applicable information and 10privacy, security, and disclosure laws, State and federal 11agencies and departments shall provide the Illinois Department 12access to confidential and other information and data 13necessary to perform eligibility and payment verifications and 14other Illinois Department functions. This includes, but is not 15limited to: information pertaining to licensure; 16certification; earnings; immigration status; citizenship; wage 17reporting; unearned and earned income; pension income; 18employment; supplemental security income; social security 19numbers; National Provider Identifier (NPI) numbers; the 20National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB); program and agency 21exclusions; taxpayer identification numbers; tax delinquency; 22corporate information; and death records.23    The Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with 24State agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter 25into agreements with federal agencies and departments, under 26which such agencies and departments shall share data necessary   HB1456- 43 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1for medical assistance program integrity functions and 2oversight. The Illinois Department shall develop, in 3cooperation with other State departments and agencies, and in 4compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 5appropriate and effective methods to share such data. At a 6minimum, and to the extent necessary to provide data sharing, 7the Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with State 8agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter into 9agreements with federal agencies and departments, including, 10but not limited to: the Secretary of State; the Department of 11Revenue; the Department of Public Health; the Department of 12Human Services; and the Department of Financial and 13Professional Regulation.14    Beginning in fiscal year 2013, the Illinois Department 15shall set forth a request for information to identify the 16benefits of a pre-payment, post-adjudication, and post-edit 17claims system with the goals of streamlining claims processing 18and provider reimbursement, reducing the number of pending or 19rejected claims, and helping to ensure a more transparent 20adjudication process through the utilization of: (i) provider 21data verification and provider screening technology; and (ii) 22clinical code editing; and (iii) pre-pay, pre-adjudicated, or 23post-adjudicated predictive modeling with an integrated case 24management system with link analysis. Such a request for 25information shall not be considered as a request for proposal 26or as an obligation on the part of the Illinois Department to   HB1456- 44 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1take any action or acquire any products or services. 2    The Illinois Department shall establish policies, 3procedures, standards and criteria by rule for the 4acquisition, repair and replacement of orthotic and prosthetic 5devices and durable medical equipment. Such rules shall 6provide, but not be limited to, the following services: (1) 7immediate repair or replacement of such devices by recipients; 8and (2) rental, lease, purchase or lease-purchase of durable 9medical equipment in a cost-effective manner, taking into 10consideration the recipient's medical prognosis, the extent of 11the recipient's needs, and the requirements and costs for 12maintaining such equipment. Subject to prior approval, such 13rules shall enable a recipient to temporarily acquire and use 14alternative or substitute devices or equipment pending repairs 15or replacements of any device or equipment previously 16authorized for such recipient by the Department. 17Notwithstanding any provision of Section 5-5f to the contrary, 18the Department may, by rule, exempt certain replacement 19wheelchair parts from prior approval and, for wheelchairs, 20wheelchair parts, wheelchair accessories, and related seating 21and positioning items, determine the wholesale price by 22methods other than actual acquisition costs.23    The Department shall require, by rule, all providers of 24durable medical equipment to be accredited by an accreditation 25organization approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and 26Medicaid Services and recognized by the Department in order to   HB1456- 45 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1bill the Department for providing durable medical equipment to 2recipients. No later than 15 months after the effective date 3of the rule adopted pursuant to this paragraph, all providers 4must meet the accreditation requirement.5    In order to promote environmental responsibility, meet the 6needs of recipients and enrollees, and achieve significant 7cost savings, the Department, or a managed care organization 8under contract with the Department, may provide recipients or 9managed care enrollees who have a prescription or Certificate 10of Medical Necessity access to refurbished durable medical 11equipment under this Section (excluding prosthetic and 12orthotic devices as defined in the Orthotics, Prosthetics, and 13Pedorthics Practice Act and complex rehabilitation technology 14products and associated services) through the State's 15assistive technology program's reutilization program, using 16staff with the Assistive Technology Professional (ATP) 17Certification if the refurbished durable medical equipment: 18(i) is available; (ii) is less expensive, including shipping 19costs, than new durable medical equipment of the same type; 20(iii) is able to withstand at least 3 years of use; (iv) is 21cleaned, disinfected, sterilized, and safe in accordance with 22federal Food and Drug Administration regulations and guidance 23governing the reprocessing of medical devices in health care 24settings; and (v) equally meets the needs of the recipient or 25enrollee. The reutilization program shall confirm that the 26recipient or enrollee is not already in receipt of the same or   HB1456- 46 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1similar equipment from another service provider, and that the 2refurbished durable medical equipment equally meets the needs 3of the recipient or enrollee. Nothing in this paragraph shall 4be construed to limit recipient or enrollee choice to obtain 5new durable medical equipment or place any additional prior 6authorization conditions on enrollees of managed care 7organizations. 8    The Department shall execute, relative to the nursing home 9prescreening project, written inter-agency agreements with the 10Department of Human Services and the Department on Aging, to 11effect the following: (i) intake procedures and common 12eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 13non-institutional services; and (ii) the establishment and 14development of non-institutional services in areas of the 15State where they are not currently available or are 16undeveloped; and (iii) notwithstanding any other provision of 17law, subject to federal approval, on and after July 1, 2012, an 18increase in the determination of need (DON) scores from 29 to 1937 for applicants for institutional and home and 20community-based long term care; if and only if federal 21approval is not granted, the Department may, in conjunction 22with other affected agencies, implement utilization controls 23or changes in benefit packages to effectuate a similar savings 24amount for this population; and (iv) no later than July 1, 252013, minimum level of care eligibility criteria for 26institutional and home and community-based long term care; and   HB1456- 47 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1(v) no later than October 1, 2013, establish procedures to 2permit long term care providers access to eligibility scores 3for individuals with an admission date who are seeking or 4receiving services from the long term care provider. In order 5to select the minimum level of care eligibility criteria, the 6Governor shall establish a workgroup that includes affected 7agency representatives and stakeholders representing the 8institutional and home and community-based long term care 9interests. This Section shall not restrict the Department from 10implementing lower level of care eligibility criteria for 11community-based services in circumstances where federal 12approval has been granted. 13    The Illinois Department shall develop and operate, in 14cooperation with other State Departments and agencies and in 15compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 16appropriate and effective systems of health care evaluation 17and programs for monitoring of utilization of health care 18services and facilities, as it affects persons eligible for 19medical assistance under this Code. 20    The Illinois Department shall report annually to the 21General Assembly, no later than the second Friday in April of 221979 and each year thereafter, in regard to: 23        (a) actual statistics and trends in utilization of 24    medical services by public aid recipients; 25        (b) actual statistics and trends in the provision of 26    the various medical services by medical vendors;   HB1456- 48 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1        (c) current rate structures and proposed changes in 2    those rate structures for the various medical vendors; and 3        (d) efforts at utilization review and control by the 4    Illinois Department. 5    The period covered by each report shall be the 3 years 6ending on the June 30 prior to the report. The report shall 7include suggested legislation for consideration by the General 8Assembly. The requirement for reporting to the General 9Assembly shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as 10required by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization 11Act, and filing such additional copies with the State 12Government Report Distribution Center for the General Assembly 13as is required under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State 14Library Act. 15    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 16any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 17with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 18Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 19Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 20whatever reason, is unauthorized. 21    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 22rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 23any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 24of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 25with Section 5-5e. 26    Because kidney transplantation can be an appropriate,   HB1456- 49 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1cost-effective alternative to renal dialysis when medically 2necessary and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1-11 3of this Code, beginning October 1, 2014, the Department shall 4cover kidney transplantation for noncitizens with end-stage 5renal disease who are not eligible for comprehensive medical 6benefits, who meet the residency requirements of Section 5-3 7of this Code, and who would otherwise meet the financial 8requirements of the appropriate class of eligible persons 9under Section 5-2 of this Code. To qualify for coverage of 10kidney transplantation, such person must be receiving 11emergency renal dialysis services covered by the Department. 12Providers under this Section shall be prior approved and 13certified by the Department to perform kidney transplantation 14and the services under this Section shall be limited to 15services associated with kidney transplantation. 16    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to the 17contrary, on or after July 1, 2015, all FDA-approved FDA 18approved forms of medication assisted treatment prescribed for 19the treatment of alcohol dependence or treatment of opioid 20dependence shall be covered under both fee-for-service and 21managed care medical assistance programs for persons who are 22otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article 23and shall not be subject to any (1) utilization control, other 24than those established under the American Society of Addiction 25Medicine patient placement criteria, (2) prior authorization 26mandate, (3) lifetime restriction limit mandate, or (4)   HB1456- 50 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1limitations on dosage. 2    On or after July 1, 2015, opioid antagonists prescribed 3for the treatment of an opioid overdose, including the 4medication product, administration devices, and any pharmacy 5fees or hospital fees related to the dispensing, distribution, 6and administration of the opioid antagonist, shall be covered 7under the medical assistance program for persons who are 8otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 9As used in this Section, "opioid antagonist" means a drug that 10binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of 11opioids acting on those receptors, including, but not limited 12to, naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting drug 13approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. The 14Department shall not impose a copayment on the coverage 15provided for naloxone hydrochloride under the medical 16assistance program.17    Upon federal approval, the Department shall provide 18coverage and reimbursement for all drugs that are approved for 19marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration and that 20are recommended by the federal Public Health Service or the 21United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention for 22pre-exposure prophylaxis and related pre-exposure prophylaxis 23services, including, but not limited to, HIV and sexually 24transmitted infection screening, treatment for sexually 25transmitted infections, medical monitoring, assorted labs, and 26counseling to reduce the likelihood of HIV infection among   HB1456- 51 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1individuals who are not infected with HIV but who are at high 2risk of HIV infection.3    A federally qualified health center, as defined in Section 41905(l)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, shall be 5reimbursed by the Department in accordance with the federally 6qualified health center's encounter rate for services provided 7to medical assistance recipients that are performed by a 8dental hygienist, as defined under the Illinois Dental 9Practice Act, working under the general supervision of a 10dentist and employed by a federally qualified health center. 11    Within 90 days after October 8, 2021 (the effective date 12of Public Act 102-665), the Department shall seek federal 13approval of a State Plan amendment to expand coverage for 14family planning services that includes presumptive eligibility 15to individuals whose income is at or below 208% of the federal 16poverty level. Coverage under this Section shall be effective 17beginning no later than December 1, 2022.18    Subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare 19and Medicaid Services of a Title XIX State Plan amendment 20electing the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly 21(PACE) as a State Medicaid option, as provided for by Subtitle 22I (commencing with Section 4801) of Title IV of the Balanced 23Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and Part 460 24(commencing with Section 460.2) of Subchapter E of Title 42 of 25the Code of Federal Regulations, PACE program services shall 26become a covered benefit of the medical assistance program,   HB1456- 52 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1subject to criteria established in accordance with all 2applicable laws.3    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 4community-based pediatric palliative care from a trained 5interdisciplinary team shall be covered under the medical 6assistance program as provided in Section 15 of the Pediatric 7Palliative Care Act.8    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, within 912 months after June 2, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 10102-1037) and subject to federal approval, acupuncture 11services performed by an acupuncturist licensed under the 12Acupuncture Practice Act who is acting within the scope of his 13or her license shall be covered under the medical assistance 14program. The Department shall apply for any federal waiver or 15State Plan amendment, if required, to implement this 16paragraph. The Department may adopt any rules, including 17standards and criteria, necessary to implement this paragraph. 18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 19medical assistance program shall, subject to federal approval, 20reimburse hospitals for costs associated with a newborn 21screening test for the presence of metachromatic 22leukodystrophy, as required under the Newborn Metabolic 23Screening Act, at a rate not less than the fee charged by the 24Department of Public Health. Notwithstanding any other 25provision of this Code, the medical assistance program shall, 26subject to appropriation and federal approval, also reimburse   HB1456- 53 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1hospitals for costs associated with all newborn screening 2tests added on and after August 9, 2024 (the effective date of 3Public Act 103-909) this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 4Assembly to the Newborn Metabolic Screening Act and required 5to be performed under that Act at a rate not less than the fee 6charged by the Department of Public Health. The Department 7shall seek federal approval before the implementation of the 8newborn screening test fees by the Department of Public 9Health. 10    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 11beginning on January 1, 2024, subject to federal approval, 12cognitive assessment and care planning services provided to a 13person who experiences signs or symptoms of cognitive 14impairment, as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical 15Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, shall be covered 16under the medical assistance program for persons who are 17otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 19medically necessary reconstructive services that are intended 20to restore physical appearance shall be covered under the 21medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 22eligible for medical assistance under this Article. As used in 23this paragraph, "reconstructive services" means treatments 24performed on structures of the body damaged by trauma to 25restore physical appearance. 26(Source: P.A. 102-43, Article 30, Section 30-5, eff. 7-6-21;   HB1456- 54 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1102-43, Article 35, Section 35-5, eff. 7-6-21; 102-43, Article 255, Section 55-5, eff. 7-6-21; 102-95, eff. 1-1-22; 102-123, 3eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-598, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-655, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-813, eff. 55-13-22; 102-1018, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1037, eff. 6-2-22; 6102-1038, eff. 1-1-23; 103-102, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 71-1-24; 103-102, Article 95, Section 95-15, eff. 1-1-24; 8103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-368, eff. 91-1-24; 103-593, Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, 10Article 90, Section 90-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 11103-909, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1040, eff. 8-9-24; revised 1210-10-24.) 13    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)14    Sec. 5-5. Medical services. The Illinois Department, by 15rule, shall determine the quantity and quality of and the rate 16of reimbursement for the medical assistance for which payment 17will be authorized, and the medical services to be provided, 18which may include all or part of the following: (1) inpatient 19hospital services; (2) outpatient hospital services; (3) other 20laboratory and X-ray services; (4) skilled nursing home 21services; (5) physicians' services whether furnished in the 22office, the patient's home, a hospital, a skilled nursing 23home, or elsewhere; (6) medical care, or any other type of 24remedial care furnished by licensed practitioners; (7) home 25health care services; (8) private duty nursing service; (9)   HB1456- 55 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1clinic services; (10) dental services, including prevention 2and treatment of periodontal disease and dental caries disease 3for pregnant individuals, provided by an individual licensed 4to practice dentistry or dental surgery; for purposes of this 5item (10), "dental services" means diagnostic, preventive, or 6corrective procedures provided by or under the supervision of 7a dentist in the practice of his or her profession; (11) 8physical therapy and related services; (12) prescribed drugs, 9dentures, and prosthetic devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by 10a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye, or by an 11optometrist, whichever the person may select; (13) other 12diagnostic, screening, preventive, and rehabilitative 13services, including to ensure that the individual's need for 14intervention or treatment of mental disorders or substance use 15disorders or co-occurring mental health and substance use 16disorders is determined using a uniform screening, assessment, 17and evaluation process inclusive of criteria, for children and 18adults; for purposes of this item (13), a uniform screening, 19assessment, and evaluation process refers to a process that 20includes an appropriate evaluation and, as warranted, a 21referral; "uniform" does not mean the use of a singular 22instrument, tool, or process that all must utilize; (14) 23transportation and such other expenses as may be necessary; 24(15) medical treatment of sexual assault survivors, as defined 25in Section 1a of the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 26Treatment Act, for injuries sustained as a result of the   HB1456- 56 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1sexual assault, including examinations and laboratory tests to 2discover evidence which may be used in criminal proceedings 3arising from the sexual assault; (16) the diagnosis and 4treatment of sickle cell anemia; (16.5) services performed by 5a chiropractic physician licensed under the Medical Practice 6Act of 1987 and acting within the scope of his or her license, 7including, but not limited to, chiropractic manipulative 8treatment; and (17) any other medical care, and any other type 9of remedial care recognized under the laws of this State. The 10term "any other type of remedial care" shall include nursing 11care and nursing home service for persons who rely on 12treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer for healing. 13    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 14comprehensive tobacco use cessation program that includes 15purchasing prescription drugs or prescription medical devices 16approved by the Food and Drug Administration shall be covered 17under the medical assistance program under this Article for 18persons who are otherwise eligible for assistance under this 19Article. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 21reproductive health care that is otherwise legal in Illinois 22shall be covered under the medical assistance program for 23persons who are otherwise eligible for medical assistance 24under this Article. 25    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, all 26tobacco cessation medications approved by the United States   HB1456- 57 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1Food and Drug Administration and all individual and group 2tobacco cessation counseling services and telephone-based 3counseling services and tobacco cessation medications provided 4through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline shall be covered under 5the medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 6eligible for assistance under this Article. The Department 7shall comply with all federal requirements necessary to obtain 8federal financial participation, as specified in 42 CFR 9433.15(b)(7), for telephone-based counseling services provided 10through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline, including, but not 11limited to: (i) entering into a memorandum of understanding or 12interagency agreement with the Department of Public Health, as 13administrator of the Illinois Tobacco Quitline; and (ii) 14developing a cost allocation plan for Medicaid-allowable 15Illinois Tobacco Quitline services in accordance with 45 CFR 1695.507. The Department shall submit the memorandum of 17understanding or interagency agreement, the cost allocation 18plan, and all other necessary documentation to the Centers for 19Medicare and Medicaid Services for review and approval. 20Coverage under this paragraph shall be contingent upon federal 21approval.22    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 23Illinois Department may not require, as a condition of payment 24for any laboratory test authorized under this Article, that a 25physician's handwritten signature appear on the laboratory 26test order form. The Illinois Department may, however, impose   HB1456- 58 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1other appropriate requirements regarding laboratory test order 2documentation. 3    Upon receipt of federal approval of an amendment to the 4Illinois Title XIX State Plan for this purpose, the Department 5shall authorize the Chicago Public Schools (CPS) to procure a 6vendor or vendors to manufacture eyeglasses for individuals 7enrolled in a school within the CPS system. CPS shall ensure 8that its vendor or vendors are enrolled as providers in the 9medical assistance program and in any capitated Medicaid 10managed care entity (MCE) serving individuals enrolled in a 11school within the CPS system. Under any contract procured 12under this provision, the vendor or vendors must serve only 13individuals enrolled in a school within the CPS system. Claims 14for services provided by CPS's vendor or vendors to recipients 15of benefits in the medical assistance program under this Code, 16the Children's Health Insurance Program, or the Covering ALL 17KIDS Health Insurance Program shall be submitted to the 18Department or the MCE in which the individual is enrolled for 19payment and shall be reimbursed at the Department's or the 20MCE's established rates or rate methodologies for eyeglasses. 21    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department of Healthcare 22and Family Services may provide the following services to 23persons eligible for assistance under this Article who are 24participating in education, training or employment programs 25operated by the Department of Human Services as successor to 26the Department of Public Aid:  HB1456- 59 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1        (1) dental services provided by or under the 2    supervision of a dentist; and 3        (2) eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in 4    the diseases of the eye, or by an optometrist, whichever 5    the person may select.6    On and after July 1, 2018, the Department of Healthcare 7and Family Services shall provide dental services to any adult 8who is otherwise eligible for assistance under the medical 9assistance program. As used in this paragraph, "dental 10services" means diagnostic, preventative, restorative, or 11corrective procedures, including procedures and services for 12the prevention and treatment of periodontal disease and dental 13caries disease, provided by an individual who is licensed to 14practice dentistry or dental surgery or who is under the 15supervision of a dentist in the practice of his or her 16profession.17    On and after July 1, 2018, targeted dental services, as 18set forth in Exhibit D of the Consent Decree entered by the 19United States District Court for the Northern District of 20Illinois, Eastern Division, in the matter of Memisovski v. 21Maram, Case No. 92 C 1982, that are provided to adults under 22the medical assistance program shall be established at no less 23than the rates set forth in the "New Rate" column in Exhibit D 24of the Consent Decree for targeted dental services that are 25provided to persons under the age of 18 under the medical 26assistance program.   HB1456- 60 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2025, 2the rates paid for sedation evaluation and the provision of 3deep sedation and intravenous sedation for the purpose of 4dental services shall be increased by 33% above the rates in 5effect on December 31, 2024. The rates paid for nitrous oxide 6sedation shall not be impacted by this paragraph and shall 7remain the same as the rates in effect on December 31, 2024. 8    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code and 9subject to federal approval, the Department may adopt rules to 10allow a dentist who is volunteering his or her service at no 11cost to render dental services through an enrolled 12not-for-profit health clinic without the dentist personally 13enrolling as a participating provider in the medical 14assistance program. A not-for-profit health clinic shall 15include a public health clinic or Federally Qualified Health 16Center or other enrolled provider, as determined by the 17Department, through which dental services covered under this 18Section are performed. The Department shall establish a 19process for payment of claims for reimbursement for covered 20dental services rendered under this provision. 21    Subject to appropriation and to federal approval, the 22Department shall file administrative rules updating the 23Handicapping Labio-Lingual Deviation orthodontic scoring tool 24by January 1, 2025, or as soon as practicable. 25    On and after January 1, 2022, the Department of Healthcare 26and Family Services shall administer and regulate a   HB1456- 61 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1school-based dental program that allows for the out-of-office 2delivery of preventative dental services in a school setting 3to children under 19 years of age. The Department shall 4establish, by rule, guidelines for participation by providers 5and set requirements for follow-up referral care based on the 6requirements established in the Dental Office Reference Manual 7published by the Department that establishes the requirements 8for dentists participating in the All Kids Dental School 9Program. Every effort shall be made by the Department when 10developing the program requirements to consider the different 11geographic differences of both urban and rural areas of the 12State for initial treatment and necessary follow-up care. No 13provider shall be charged a fee by any unit of local government 14to participate in the school-based dental program administered 15by the Department. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 16construed to limit or preempt a home rule unit's or school 17district's authority to establish, change, or administer a 18school-based dental program in addition to, or independent of, 19the school-based dental program administered by the 20Department. 21    The Illinois Department, by rule, may distinguish and 22classify the medical services to be provided only in 23accordance with the classes of persons designated in Section 245-2. 25    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services must 26provide coverage and reimbursement for amino acid-based   HB1456- 62 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1elemental formulas, regardless of delivery method, for the 2diagnosis and treatment of (i) eosinophilic disorders and (ii) 3short bowel syndrome when the prescribing physician has issued 4a written order stating that the amino acid-based elemental 5formula is medically necessary. 6    The Illinois Department shall authorize the provision of, 7and shall authorize payment for, screening by low-dose 8mammography for the presence of occult breast cancer for 9individuals 35 years of age or older who are eligible for 10medical assistance under this Article, as follows:11        (A) A baseline mammogram for individuals 35 to 39 12    years of age. 13        (B) An annual mammogram for individuals 40 years of 14    age or older.15        (C) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 16    medically necessary by the individual's health care 17    provider for individuals under 40 years of age and having 18    a family history of breast cancer, prior personal history 19    of breast cancer, positive genetic testing, or other risk 20    factors.21        (D) A comprehensive ultrasound screening and MRI of an 22    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 23    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 24    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 25    practice medicine in all of its branches. 26        (E) A screening MRI when medically necessary, as   HB1456- 63 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine in 2    all of its branches. 3        (F) A diagnostic mammogram when medically necessary, 4    as determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine 5    in all its branches, advanced practice registered nurse, 6    or physician assistant. 7        (G) Molecular breast imaging (MBI) and MRI of an 8    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 9    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 10    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 11    practice medicine in all of its branches, advanced 12    practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. 13    The Department shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, 14copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on the 15coverage provided under this paragraph; except that this 16sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 17to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 18health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 19pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 20U.S.C. 223). 21    All screenings shall include a physical breast exam, 22instruction on self-examination and information regarding the 23frequency of self-examination and its value as a preventative 24tool.25    For purposes of this Section:26    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using   HB1456- 64 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1diagnostic mammography.2    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that 3is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 4an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a 5subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the 6breast.7    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the 8breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 9including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and 10image receptor, with an average radiation exposure delivery of 11less than one rad per breast for 2 views of an average size 12breast. The term also includes digital mammography and 13includes breast tomosynthesis.14    "Breast tomosynthesis" means a radiologic procedure that 15involves the acquisition of projection images over the 16stationary breast to produce cross-sectional digital 17three-dimensional images of the breast.18    If, at any time, the Secretary of the United States 19Department of Health and Human Services, or its successor 20agency, promulgates rules or regulations to be published in 21the Federal Register or publishes a comment in the Federal 22Register or issues an opinion, guidance, or other action that 23would require the State, pursuant to any provision of the 24Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 25111-148), including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C. 2618031(d)(3)(B) or any successor provision, to defray the cost   HB1456- 65 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1of any coverage for breast tomosynthesis outlined in this 2paragraph, then the requirement that an insurer cover breast 3tomosynthesis is inoperative other than any such coverage 4authorized under Section 1902 of the Social Security Act, 42 5U.S.C. 1396a, and the State shall not assume any obligation 6for the cost of coverage for breast tomosynthesis set forth in 7this paragraph.8    On and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall ensure 9that all networks of care for adult clients of the Department 10include access to at least one breast imaging Center of 11Imaging Excellence as certified by the American College of 12Radiology.13    On and after January 1, 2012, providers participating in a 14quality improvement program approved by the Department shall 15be reimbursed for screening and diagnostic mammography at the 16same rate as the Medicare program's rates, including the 17increased reimbursement for digital mammography and, after 18January 1, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1018), 19breast tomosynthesis.20    The Department shall convene an expert panel including 21representatives of hospitals, free-standing mammography 22facilities, and doctors, including radiologists, to establish 23quality standards for mammography.24    On and after January 1, 2017, providers participating in a 25breast cancer treatment quality improvement program approved 26by the Department shall be reimbursed for breast cancer   HB1456- 66 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1treatment at a rate that is no lower than 95% of the Medicare 2program's rates for the data elements included in the breast 3cancer treatment quality program.4    The Department shall convene an expert panel, including 5representatives of hospitals, free-standing breast cancer 6treatment centers, breast cancer quality organizations, and 7doctors, including radiologists that are trained in all forms 8of FDA-approved FDA approved breast imaging technologies, 9breast surgeons, reconstructive breast surgeons, oncologists, 10and primary care providers to establish quality standards for 11breast cancer treatment.12    Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 13establish a rate methodology for mammography at federally 14qualified health centers and other encounter-rate clinics. 15These clinics or centers may also collaborate with other 16hospital-based mammography facilities. By January 1, 2016, the 17Department shall report to the General Assembly on the status 18of the provision set forth in this paragraph.19    The Department shall establish a methodology to remind 20individuals who are age-appropriate for screening mammography, 21but who have not received a mammogram within the previous 18 22months, of the importance and benefit of screening 23mammography. The Department shall work with experts in breast 24cancer outreach and patient navigation to optimize these 25reminders and shall establish a methodology for evaluating 26their effectiveness and modifying the methodology based on the   HB1456- 67 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1evaluation.2    The Department shall establish a performance goal for 3primary care providers with respect to their female patients 4over age 40 receiving an annual mammogram. This performance 5goal shall be used to provide additional reimbursement in the 6form of a quality performance bonus to primary care providers 7who meet that goal.8    The Department shall devise a means of case-managing or 9patient navigation for beneficiaries diagnosed with breast 10cancer. This program shall initially operate as a pilot 11program in areas of the State with the highest incidence of 12mortality related to breast cancer. At least one pilot program 13site shall be in the metropolitan Chicago area and at least one 14site shall be outside the metropolitan Chicago area. On or 15after July 1, 2016, the pilot program shall be expanded to 16include one site in western Illinois, one site in southern 17Illinois, one site in central Illinois, and 4 sites within 18metropolitan Chicago. An evaluation of the pilot program shall 19be carried out measuring health outcomes and cost of care for 20those served by the pilot program compared to similarly 21situated patients who are not served by the pilot program. 22    The Department shall require all networks of care to 23develop a means either internally or by contract with experts 24in navigation and community outreach to navigate cancer 25patients to comprehensive care in a timely fashion. The 26Department shall require all networks of care to include   HB1456- 68 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1access for patients diagnosed with cancer to at least one 2academic commission on cancer-accredited cancer program as an 3in-network covered benefit.4    The Department shall provide coverage and reimbursement 5for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine that is approved for 6marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration for all 7persons between the ages of 9 and 45. Subject to federal 8approval, the Department shall provide coverage and 9reimbursement for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine for 10persons of the age of 46 and above who have been diagnosed with 11cervical dysplasia with a high risk of recurrence or 12progression. The Department shall disallow any 13preauthorization requirements for the administration of the 14human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine. 15    On or after July 1, 2022, individuals who are otherwise 16eligible for medical assistance under this Article shall 17receive coverage for perinatal depression screenings for the 1812-month period beginning on the last day of their pregnancy. 19Medical assistance coverage under this paragraph shall be 20conditioned on the use of a screening instrument approved by 21the Department.22    Any medical or health care provider shall immediately 23recommend, to any pregnant individual who is being provided 24prenatal services and is suspected of having a substance use 25disorder as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 26referral to a local substance use disorder treatment program   HB1456- 69 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1licensed by the Department of Human Services or to a licensed 2hospital which provides substance abuse treatment services. 3The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall assure 4coverage for the cost of treatment of the drug abuse or 5addiction for pregnant recipients in accordance with the 6Illinois Medicaid Program in conjunction with the Department 7of Human Services. 8    All medical providers providing medical assistance to 9pregnant individuals under this Code shall receive information 10from the Department on the availability of services under any 11program providing case management services for addicted 12individuals, including information on appropriate referrals 13for other social services that may be needed by addicted 14individuals in addition to treatment for addiction. 15    The Illinois Department, in cooperation with the 16Departments of Human Services (as successor to the Department 17of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse) and Public Health, through 18a public awareness campaign, may provide information 19concerning treatment for alcoholism and drug abuse and 20addiction, prenatal health care, and other pertinent programs 21directed at reducing the number of drug-affected infants born 22to recipients of medical assistance. 23    Neither the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 24nor the Department of Human Services shall sanction the 25recipient solely on the basis of the recipient's substance 26abuse.   HB1456- 70 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    The Illinois Department shall establish such regulations 2governing the dispensing of health services under this Article 3as it shall deem appropriate. The Department should seek the 4advice of formal professional advisory committees appointed by 5the Director of the Illinois Department for the purpose of 6providing regular advice on policy and administrative matters, 7information dissemination and educational activities for 8medical and health care providers, and consistency in 9procedures to the Illinois Department. 10    The Illinois Department may develop and contract with 11Partnerships of medical providers to arrange medical services 12for persons eligible under Section 5-2 of this Code. 13Implementation of this Section may be by demonstration 14projects in certain geographic areas. The Partnership shall be 15represented by a sponsor organization. The Department, by 16rule, shall develop qualifications for sponsors of 17Partnerships. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 18require that the sponsor organization be a medical 19organization. 20    The sponsor must negotiate formal written contracts with 21medical providers for physician services, inpatient and 22outpatient hospital care, home health services, treatment for 23alcoholism and substance abuse, and other services determined 24necessary by the Illinois Department by rule for delivery by 25Partnerships. Physician services must include prenatal and 26obstetrical care. The Illinois Department shall reimburse   HB1456- 71 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1medical services delivered by Partnership providers to clients 2in target areas according to provisions of this Article and 3the Illinois Health Finance Reform Act, except that: 4        (1) Physicians participating in a Partnership and 5    providing certain services, which shall be determined by 6    the Illinois Department, to persons in areas covered by 7    the Partnership may receive an additional surcharge for 8    such services. 9        (2) The Department may elect to consider and negotiate 10    financial incentives to encourage the development of 11    Partnerships and the efficient delivery of medical care. 12        (3) Persons receiving medical services through 13    Partnerships may receive medical and case management 14    services above the level usually offered through the 15    medical assistance program. 16    Medical providers shall be required to meet certain 17qualifications to participate in Partnerships to ensure the 18delivery of high quality medical services. These 19qualifications shall be determined by rule of the Illinois 20Department and may be higher than qualifications for 21participation in the medical assistance program. Partnership 22sponsors may prescribe reasonable additional qualifications 23for participation by medical providers, only with the prior 24written approval of the Illinois Department. 25    Nothing in this Section shall limit the free choice of 26practitioners, hospitals, and other providers of medical   HB1456- 72 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1services by clients. In order to ensure patient freedom of 2choice, the Illinois Department shall immediately promulgate 3all rules and take all other necessary actions so that 4provided services may be accessed from therapeutically 5certified optometrists to the full extent of the Illinois 6Optometric Practice Act of 1987 without discriminating between 7service providers. 8    The Department shall apply for a waiver from the United 9States Health Care Financing Administration to allow for the 10implementation of Partnerships under this Section. 11    The Illinois Department shall require health care 12providers to maintain records that document the medical care 13and services provided to recipients of Medical Assistance 14under this Article. Such records must be retained for a period 15of not less than 6 years from the date of service or as 16provided by applicable State law, whichever period is longer, 17except that if an audit is initiated within the required 18retention period then the records must be retained until the 19audit is completed and every exception is resolved. The 20Illinois Department shall require health care providers to 21make available, when authorized by the patient, in writing, 22the medical records in a timely fashion to other health care 23providers who are treating or serving persons eligible for 24Medical Assistance under this Article. All dispensers of 25medical services shall be required to maintain and retain 26business and professional records sufficient to fully and   HB1456- 73 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1accurately document the nature, scope, details and receipt of 2the health care provided to persons eligible for medical 3assistance under this Code, in accordance with regulations 4promulgated by the Illinois Department. The rules and 5regulations shall require that proof of the receipt of 6prescription drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and 7eyeglasses by eligible persons under this Section accompany 8each claim for reimbursement submitted by the dispenser of 9such medical services. No such claims for reimbursement shall 10be approved for payment by the Illinois Department without 11such proof of receipt, unless the Illinois Department shall 12have put into effect and shall be operating a system of 13post-payment audit and review which shall, on a sampling 14basis, be deemed adequate by the Illinois Department to assure 15that such drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and eyeglasses 16for which payment is being made are actually being received by 17eligible recipients. Within 90 days after September 16, 1984 18(the effective date of Public Act 83-1439), the Illinois 19Department shall establish a current list of acquisition costs 20for all prosthetic devices and any other items recognized as 21medical equipment and supplies reimbursable under this Article 22and shall update such list on a quarterly basis, except that 23the acquisition costs of all prescription drugs shall be 24updated no less frequently than every 30 days as required by 25Section 5-5.12. 26    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the   HB1456- 74 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after July 22, 2013 2(the effective date of Public Act 98-104), establish 3procedures to permit skilled care facilities licensed under 4the Nursing Home Care Act to submit monthly billing claims for 5reimbursement purposes. Following development of these 6procedures, the Department shall, by July 1, 2016, test the 7viability of the new system and implement any necessary 8operational or structural changes to its information 9technology platforms in order to allow for the direct 10acceptance and payment of nursing home claims. 11    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 12Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after August 15, 132014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-963), establish 14procedures to permit ID/DD facilities licensed under the ID/DD 15Community Care Act and MC/DD facilities licensed under the 16MC/DD Act to submit monthly billing claims for reimbursement 17purposes. Following development of these procedures, the 18Department shall have an additional 365 days to test the 19viability of the new system and to ensure that any necessary 20operational or structural changes to its information 21technology platforms are implemented. 22    The Illinois Department shall require all dispensers of 23medical services, other than an individual practitioner or 24group of practitioners, desiring to participate in the Medical 25Assistance program established under this Article to disclose 26all financial, beneficial, ownership, equity, surety or other   HB1456- 75 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1interests in any and all firms, corporations, partnerships, 2associations, business enterprises, joint ventures, agencies, 3institutions or other legal entities providing any form of 4health care services in this State under this Article. 5    The Illinois Department may require that all dispensers of 6medical services desiring to participate in the medical 7assistance program established under this Article disclose, 8under such terms and conditions as the Illinois Department may 9by rule establish, all inquiries from clients and attorneys 10regarding medical bills paid by the Illinois Department, which 11inquiries could indicate potential existence of claims or 12liens for the Illinois Department. 13    Enrollment of a vendor shall be subject to a provisional 14period and shall be conditional for one year. During the 15period of conditional enrollment, the Department may terminate 16the vendor's eligibility to participate in, or may disenroll 17the vendor from, the medical assistance program without cause. 18Unless otherwise specified, such termination of eligibility or 19disenrollment is not subject to the Department's hearing 20process. However, a disenrolled vendor may reapply without 21penalty. 22    The Department has the discretion to limit the conditional 23enrollment period for vendors based upon the category of risk 24of the vendor.25    Prior to enrollment and during the conditional enrollment 26period in the medical assistance program, all vendors shall be   HB1456- 76 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1subject to enhanced oversight, screening, and review based on 2the risk of fraud, waste, and abuse that is posed by the 3category of risk of the vendor. The Illinois Department shall 4establish the procedures for oversight, screening, and review, 5which may include, but need not be limited to: criminal and 6financial background checks; fingerprinting; license, 7certification, and authorization verifications; unscheduled or 8unannounced site visits; database checks; prepayment audit 9reviews; audits; payment caps; payment suspensions; and other 10screening as required by federal or State law.11    The Department shall define or specify the following: (i) 12by provider notice, the "category of risk of the vendor" for 13each type of vendor, which shall take into account the level of 14screening applicable to a particular category of vendor under 15federal law and regulations; (ii) by rule or provider notice, 16the maximum length of the conditional enrollment period for 17each category of risk of the vendor; and (iii) by rule, the 18hearing rights, if any, afforded to a vendor in each category 19of risk of the vendor that is terminated or disenrolled during 20the conditional enrollment period. 21    To be eligible for payment consideration, a vendor's 22payment claim or bill, either as an initial claim or as a 23resubmitted claim following prior rejection, must be received 24by the Illinois Department, or its fiscal intermediary, no 25later than 180 days after the latest date on the claim on which 26medical goods or services were provided, with the following   HB1456- 77 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1exceptions:2        (1) In the case of a provider whose enrollment is in 3    process by the Illinois Department, the 180-day period 4    shall not begin until the date on the written notice from 5    the Illinois Department that the provider enrollment is 6    complete.7        (2) In the case of errors attributable to the Illinois 8    Department or any of its claims processing intermediaries 9    which result in an inability to receive, process, or 10    adjudicate a claim, the 180-day period shall not begin 11    until the provider has been notified of the error.12        (3) In the case of a provider for whom the Illinois 13    Department initiates the monthly billing process.14        (4) In the case of a provider operated by a unit of 15    local government with a population exceeding 3,000,000 16    when local government funds finance federal participation 17    for claims payments. 18    For claims for services rendered during a period for which 19a recipient received retroactive eligibility, claims must be 20filed within 180 days after the Department determines the 21applicant is eligible. For claims for which the Illinois 22Department is not the primary payer, claims must be submitted 23to the Illinois Department within 180 days after the final 24adjudication by the primary payer.25    In the case of long term care facilities, within 120 26calendar days of receipt by the facility of required   HB1456- 78 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1prescreening information, new admissions with associated 2admission documents shall be submitted through the Medical 3Electronic Data Interchange (MEDI) or the Recipient 4Eligibility Verification (REV) System or shall be submitted 5directly to the Department of Human Services using required 6admission forms. Effective September 1, 2014, admission 7documents, including all prescreening information, must be 8submitted through MEDI or REV. Confirmation numbers assigned 9to an accepted transaction shall be retained by a facility to 10verify timely submittal. Once an admission transaction has 11been completed, all resubmitted claims following prior 12rejection are subject to receipt no later than 180 days after 13the admission transaction has been completed.14    Claims that are not submitted and received in compliance 15with the foregoing requirements shall not be eligible for 16payment under the medical assistance program, and the State 17shall have no liability for payment of those claims.18    To the extent consistent with applicable information and 19privacy, security, and disclosure laws, State and federal 20agencies and departments shall provide the Illinois Department 21access to confidential and other information and data 22necessary to perform eligibility and payment verifications and 23other Illinois Department functions. This includes, but is not 24limited to: information pertaining to licensure; 25certification; earnings; immigration status; citizenship; wage 26reporting; unearned and earned income; pension income;   HB1456- 79 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1employment; supplemental security income; social security 2numbers; National Provider Identifier (NPI) numbers; the 3National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB); program and agency 4exclusions; taxpayer identification numbers; tax delinquency; 5corporate information; and death records.6    The Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with 7State agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter 8into agreements with federal agencies and departments, under 9which such agencies and departments shall share data necessary 10for medical assistance program integrity functions and 11oversight. The Illinois Department shall develop, in 12cooperation with other State departments and agencies, and in 13compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 14appropriate and effective methods to share such data. At a 15minimum, and to the extent necessary to provide data sharing, 16the Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with State 17agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter into 18agreements with federal agencies and departments, including, 19but not limited to: the Secretary of State; the Department of 20Revenue; the Department of Public Health; the Department of 21Human Services; and the Department of Financial and 22Professional Regulation.23    Beginning in fiscal year 2013, the Illinois Department 24shall set forth a request for information to identify the 25benefits of a pre-payment, post-adjudication, and post-edit 26claims system with the goals of streamlining claims processing   HB1456- 80 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1and provider reimbursement, reducing the number of pending or 2rejected claims, and helping to ensure a more transparent 3adjudication process through the utilization of: (i) provider 4data verification and provider screening technology; and (ii) 5clinical code editing; and (iii) pre-pay, pre-adjudicated, or 6post-adjudicated predictive modeling with an integrated case 7management system with link analysis. Such a request for 8information shall not be considered as a request for proposal 9or as an obligation on the part of the Illinois Department to 10take any action or acquire any products or services. 11    The Illinois Department shall establish policies, 12procedures, standards and criteria by rule for the 13acquisition, repair and replacement of orthotic and prosthetic 14devices and durable medical equipment. Such rules shall 15provide, but not be limited to, the following services: (1) 16immediate repair or replacement of such devices by recipients; 17and (2) rental, lease, purchase or lease-purchase of durable 18medical equipment in a cost-effective manner, taking into 19consideration the recipient's medical prognosis, the extent of 20the recipient's needs, and the requirements and costs for 21maintaining such equipment. Subject to prior approval, such 22rules shall enable a recipient to temporarily acquire and use 23alternative or substitute devices or equipment pending repairs 24or replacements of any device or equipment previously 25authorized for such recipient by the Department. 26Notwithstanding any provision of Section 5-5f to the contrary,   HB1456- 81 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1the Department may, by rule, exempt certain replacement 2wheelchair parts from prior approval and, for wheelchairs, 3wheelchair parts, wheelchair accessories, and related seating 4and positioning items, determine the wholesale price by 5methods other than actual acquisition costs.6    The Department shall require, by rule, all providers of 7durable medical equipment to be accredited by an accreditation 8organization approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and 9Medicaid Services and recognized by the Department in order to 10bill the Department for providing durable medical equipment to 11recipients. No later than 15 months after the effective date 12of the rule adopted pursuant to this paragraph, all providers 13must meet the accreditation requirement.14    In order to promote environmental responsibility, meet the 15needs of recipients and enrollees, and achieve significant 16cost savings, the Department, or a managed care organization 17under contract with the Department, may provide recipients or 18managed care enrollees who have a prescription or Certificate 19of Medical Necessity access to refurbished durable medical 20equipment under this Section (excluding prosthetic and 21orthotic devices as defined in the Orthotics, Prosthetics, and 22Pedorthics Practice Act and complex rehabilitation technology 23products and associated services) through the State's 24assistive technology program's reutilization program, using 25staff with the Assistive Technology Professional (ATP) 26Certification if the refurbished durable medical equipment:   HB1456- 82 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1(i) is available; (ii) is less expensive, including shipping 2costs, than new durable medical equipment of the same type; 3(iii) is able to withstand at least 3 years of use; (iv) is 4cleaned, disinfected, sterilized, and safe in accordance with 5federal Food and Drug Administration regulations and guidance 6governing the reprocessing of medical devices in health care 7settings; and (v) equally meets the needs of the recipient or 8enrollee. The reutilization program shall confirm that the 9recipient or enrollee is not already in receipt of the same or 10similar equipment from another service provider, and that the 11refurbished durable medical equipment equally meets the needs 12of the recipient or enrollee. Nothing in this paragraph shall 13be construed to limit recipient or enrollee choice to obtain 14new durable medical equipment or place any additional prior 15authorization conditions on enrollees of managed care 16organizations. 17    The Department shall execute, relative to the nursing home 18prescreening project, written inter-agency agreements with the 19Department of Human Services and the Department on Aging, to 20effect the following: (i) intake procedures and common 21eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 22non-institutional services; and (ii) the establishment and 23development of non-institutional services in areas of the 24State where they are not currently available or are 25undeveloped; and (iii) notwithstanding any other provision of 26law, subject to federal approval, on and after July 1, 2012, an   HB1456- 83 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1increase in the determination of need (DON) scores from 29 to 237 for applicants for institutional and home and 3community-based long term care; if and only if federal 4approval is not granted, the Department may, in conjunction 5with other affected agencies, implement utilization controls 6or changes in benefit packages to effectuate a similar savings 7amount for this population; and (iv) no later than July 1, 82013, minimum level of care eligibility criteria for 9institutional and home and community-based long term care; and 10(v) no later than October 1, 2013, establish procedures to 11permit long term care providers access to eligibility scores 12for individuals with an admission date who are seeking or 13receiving services from the long term care provider. In order 14to select the minimum level of care eligibility criteria, the 15Governor shall establish a workgroup that includes affected 16agency representatives and stakeholders representing the 17institutional and home and community-based long term care 18interests. This Section shall not restrict the Department from 19implementing lower level of care eligibility criteria for 20community-based services in circumstances where federal 21approval has been granted. 22    The Illinois Department shall develop and operate, in 23cooperation with other State Departments and agencies and in 24compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 25appropriate and effective systems of health care evaluation 26and programs for monitoring of utilization of health care   HB1456- 84 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1services and facilities, as it affects persons eligible for 2medical assistance under this Code. 3    The Illinois Department shall report annually to the 4General Assembly, no later than the second Friday in April of 51979 and each year thereafter, in regard to: 6        (a) actual statistics and trends in utilization of 7    medical services by public aid recipients; 8        (b) actual statistics and trends in the provision of 9    the various medical services by medical vendors; 10        (c) current rate structures and proposed changes in 11    those rate structures for the various medical vendors; and 12        (d) efforts at utilization review and control by the 13    Illinois Department. 14    The period covered by each report shall be the 3 years 15ending on the June 30 prior to the report. The report shall 16include suggested legislation for consideration by the General 17Assembly. The requirement for reporting to the General 18Assembly shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as 19required by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization 20Act, and filing such additional copies with the State 21Government Report Distribution Center for the General Assembly 22as is required under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State 23Library Act. 24    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 25any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 26with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure   HB1456- 85 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 2Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 3whatever reason, is unauthorized. 4    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 5rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 6any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 7of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 8with Section 5-5e. 9    Because kidney transplantation can be an appropriate, 10cost-effective alternative to renal dialysis when medically 11necessary and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1-11 12of this Code, beginning October 1, 2014, the Department shall 13cover kidney transplantation for noncitizens with end-stage 14renal disease who are not eligible for comprehensive medical 15benefits, who meet the residency requirements of Section 5-3 16of this Code, and who would otherwise meet the financial 17requirements of the appropriate class of eligible persons 18under Section 5-2 of this Code. To qualify for coverage of 19kidney transplantation, such person must be receiving 20emergency renal dialysis services covered by the Department. 21Providers under this Section shall be prior approved and 22certified by the Department to perform kidney transplantation 23and the services under this Section shall be limited to 24services associated with kidney transplantation. 25    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to the 26contrary, on or after July 1, 2015, all FDA-approved FDA   HB1456- 86 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1approved forms of medication assisted treatment prescribed for 2the treatment of alcohol dependence or treatment of opioid 3dependence shall be covered under both fee-for-service and 4managed care medical assistance programs for persons who are 5otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article 6and shall not be subject to any (1) utilization control, other 7than those established under the American Society of Addiction 8Medicine patient placement criteria, (2) prior authorization 9mandate, (3) lifetime restriction limit mandate, or (4) 10limitations on dosage. 11    On or after July 1, 2015, opioid antagonists prescribed 12for the treatment of an opioid overdose, including the 13medication product, administration devices, and any pharmacy 14fees or hospital fees related to the dispensing, distribution, 15and administration of the opioid antagonist, shall be covered 16under the medical assistance program for persons who are 17otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 18As used in this Section, "opioid antagonist" means a drug that 19binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of 20opioids acting on those receptors, including, but not limited 21to, naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting drug 22approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. The 23Department shall not impose a copayment on the coverage 24provided for naloxone hydrochloride under the medical 25assistance program.26    Upon federal approval, the Department shall provide   HB1456- 87 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1coverage and reimbursement for all drugs that are approved for 2marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration and that 3are recommended by the federal Public Health Service or the 4United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention for 5pre-exposure prophylaxis and related pre-exposure prophylaxis 6services, including, but not limited to, HIV and sexually 7transmitted infection screening, treatment for sexually 8transmitted infections, medical monitoring, assorted labs, and 9counseling to reduce the likelihood of HIV infection among 10individuals who are not infected with HIV but who are at high 11risk of HIV infection.12    A federally qualified health center, as defined in Section 131905(l)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, shall be 14reimbursed by the Department in accordance with the federally 15qualified health center's encounter rate for services provided 16to medical assistance recipients that are performed by a 17dental hygienist, as defined under the Illinois Dental 18Practice Act, working under the general supervision of a 19dentist and employed by a federally qualified health center. 20    Within 90 days after October 8, 2021 (the effective date 21of Public Act 102-665), the Department shall seek federal 22approval of a State Plan amendment to expand coverage for 23family planning services that includes presumptive eligibility 24to individuals whose income is at or below 208% of the federal 25poverty level. Coverage under this Section shall be effective 26beginning no later than December 1, 2022.  HB1456- 88 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    Subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare 2and Medicaid Services of a Title XIX State Plan amendment 3electing the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly 4(PACE) as a State Medicaid option, as provided for by Subtitle 5I (commencing with Section 4801) of Title IV of the Balanced 6Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and Part 460 7(commencing with Section 460.2) of Subchapter E of Title 42 of 8the Code of Federal Regulations, PACE program services shall 9become a covered benefit of the medical assistance program, 10subject to criteria established in accordance with all 11applicable laws.12    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 13community-based pediatric palliative care from a trained 14interdisciplinary team shall be covered under the medical 15assistance program as provided in Section 15 of the Pediatric 16Palliative Care Act.17    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, within 1812 months after June 2, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 19102-1037) and subject to federal approval, acupuncture 20services performed by an acupuncturist licensed under the 21Acupuncture Practice Act who is acting within the scope of his 22or her license shall be covered under the medical assistance 23program. The Department shall apply for any federal waiver or 24State Plan amendment, if required, to implement this 25paragraph. The Department may adopt any rules, including 26standards and criteria, necessary to implement this paragraph.   HB1456- 89 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 2medical assistance program shall, subject to federal approval, 3reimburse hospitals for costs associated with a newborn 4screening test for the presence of metachromatic 5leukodystrophy, as required under the Newborn Metabolic 6Screening Act, at a rate not less than the fee charged by the 7Department of Public Health. Notwithstanding any other 8provision of this Code, the medical assistance program shall, 9subject to appropriation and federal approval, also reimburse 10hospitals for costs associated with all newborn screening 11tests added on and after August 9, 2024 (the effective date of 12Public Act 103-909) this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 13Assembly to the Newborn Metabolic Screening Act and required 14to be performed under that Act at a rate not less than the fee 15charged by the Department of Public Health. The Department 16shall seek federal approval before the implementation of the 17newborn screening test fees by the Department of Public 18Health. 19    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 20beginning on January 1, 2024, subject to federal approval, 21cognitive assessment and care planning services provided to a 22person who experiences signs or symptoms of cognitive 23impairment, as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical 24Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, shall be covered 25under the medical assistance program for persons who are 26otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article.   HB1456- 90 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 2medically necessary reconstructive services that are intended 3to restore physical appearance shall be covered under the 4medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 5eligible for medical assistance under this Article. As used in 6this paragraph, "reconstructive services" means treatments 7performed on structures of the body damaged by trauma to 8restore physical appearance. 9(Source: P.A. 102-43, Article 30, Section 30-5, eff. 7-6-21; 10102-43, Article 35, Section 35-5, eff. 7-6-21; 102-43, Article 1155, Section 55-5, eff. 7-6-21; 102-95, eff. 1-1-22; 102-123, 12eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-598, eff. 1-1-22; 13102-655, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-813, eff. 145-13-22; 102-1018, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1037, eff. 6-2-22; 15102-1038, eff. 1-1-23; 103-102, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 161-1-24; 103-102, Article 95, Section 95-15, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-368, eff. 181-1-24; 103-593, Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, 19Article 90, Section 90-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 20103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-909, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1040, eff. 218-9-24; revised 10-10-24.) 22    (305 ILCS 5/12-4.35)23    Sec. 12-4.35. Medical services for certain noncitizens. 24(a) Notwithstanding Section 1-11 of this Code or Section 20(a) 25of the Children's Health Insurance Program Act, the Department   HB1456- 91 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1of Healthcare and Family Services may provide medical services 2to noncitizens who have not yet attained 19 years of age and 3who are not eligible for medical assistance under Article V of 4this Code or under the Children's Health Insurance Program 5created by the Children's Health Insurance Program Act due to 6their not meeting the otherwise applicable provisions of 7Section 1-11 of this Code or Section 20(a) of the Children's 8Health Insurance Program Act. The medical services available, 9standards for eligibility, and other conditions of 10participation under this Section shall be established by rule 11by the Department; however, any such rule shall be at least as 12restrictive as the rules for medical assistance under Article 13V of this Code or the Children's Health Insurance Program 14created by the Children's Health Insurance Program Act.15    (a-5) Notwithstanding Section 1-11 of this Code, the 16Department of Healthcare and Family Services may provide 17medical assistance in accordance with Article V of this Code 18to noncitizens over the age of 65 years of age who are not 19eligible for medical assistance under Article V of this Code 20due to their not meeting the otherwise applicable provisions 21of Section 1-11 of this Code, whose income is at or below 100% 22of the federal poverty level after deducting the costs of 23medical or other remedial care, and who would otherwise meet 24the eligibility requirements in Section 5-2 of this Code. The 25medical services available, standards for eligibility, and 26other conditions of participation under this Section shall be   HB1456- 92 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1established by rule by the Department; however, any such rule 2shall be at least as restrictive as the rules for medical 3assistance under Article V of this Code. 4    (a-6) By May 30, 2022, notwithstanding Section 1-11 of 5this Code, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 6may provide medical services to noncitizens 55 years of age 7through 64 years of age who (i) are not eligible for medical 8assistance under Article V of this Code due to their not 9meeting the otherwise applicable provisions of Section 1-11 of 10this Code and (ii) have income at or below 133% of the federal 11poverty level plus 5% for the applicable family size as 12determined under applicable federal law and regulations. 13Persons eligible for medical services under Public Act 102-16 14shall receive benefits identical to the benefits provided 15under the Health Benefits Service Package as that term is 16defined in subsection (m) of Section 5-1.1 of this Code. 17    (a-7) By July 1, 2022, notwithstanding Section 1-11 of 18this Code, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 19may provide medical services to noncitizens 42 years of age 20through 54 years of age who (i) are not eligible for medical 21assistance under Article V of this Code due to their not 22meeting the otherwise applicable provisions of Section 1-11 of 23this Code and (ii) have income at or below 133% of the federal 24poverty level plus 5% for the applicable family size as 25determined under applicable federal law and regulations. The 26medical services available, standards for eligibility, and   HB1456- 93 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1other conditions of participation under this Section shall be 2established by rule by the Department; however, any such rule 3shall be at least as restrictive as the rules for medical 4assistance under Article V of this Code. In order to provide 5for the timely and expeditious implementation of this 6subsection, the Department may adopt rules necessary to 7establish and implement this subsection through the use of 8emergency rulemaking in accordance with Section 5-45 of the 9Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. For purposes of the 10Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, the General Assembly 11finds that the adoption of rules to implement this subsection 12is deemed necessary for the public interest, safety, and 13welfare. 14    (a-10) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1-11, the 15Department shall cover immunosuppressive drugs and related 16services associated with post-kidney transplant management, 17excluding long-term care costs, for noncitizens who: (i) are 18not eligible for comprehensive medical benefits; (ii) meet the 19residency requirements of Section 5-3; and (iii) would meet 20the financial eligibility requirements of Section 5-2. 21    (b) The Department is authorized to take any action that 22would not otherwise be prohibited by applicable law, 23including, without limitation, cessation or limitation of 24enrollment, reduction of available medical services, and 25changing standards for eligibility, that is deemed necessary 26by the Department during a State fiscal year to assure that   HB1456- 94 -LRB104 07779 KTG 17824 b1payments under this Section do not exceed available funds.2    (c) (Blank).3    (d) (Blank).4    (e) In order to provide for the expeditious and effective 5ongoing implementation of this Section, the Department may 6adopt rules through the use of emergency rulemaking in 7accordance with Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative 8Procedure Act, except that the limitation on the number of 9emergency rules that may be adopted in a 24-month period shall 10not apply. For purposes of the Illinois Administrative 11Procedure Act, the General Assembly finds that the adoption of 12rules to implement this Section is deemed necessary for the 13public interest, safety, and welfare. This subsection (e) is 14inoperative on and after July 1, 2025. 15(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-43, Article 25, 16Section 25-15, eff. 7-6-21; 102-43, Article 45, Section 45-5, 17eff. 7-6-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1037, eff. 6-2-22; 18103-102, eff. 6-16-23.) 19    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 20changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 21that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 22represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 23not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 24made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 25Public Act.